Authors
Raymond Johnston
Number of Reviews
34

Title
Review for Hour of the Pig, The (1993)
Director: Leslie Megahey
Starring: Colin Firth , Ian Holm, Donald Pleasence, Amina Annabi, and
          Nicol Williamson
A BBC/ CiBy 2000 film distributed in the US by Miramax
     The absolute worst thing about this film is the poorly conceived
US ad campaign.  Faced with an offbeat tough sell project, Miramax
decided to try to use their old CRYING GAME strategy and hope for
lightning to strike twice.  The ad implores you not to reveal the
identity of the client.  The still in the ad shows a minor character in
a costume not seen in the film holding a sword.  There is almost no
swordplay in the film.  Those looking for a sword and sorcery epic will
be sorely disappointed.  Fans of THE RETURN OF MARTIN GUERRE and THE
NAME OF THE ROSE, however, are in for a real treat.
     The very first frame of the film gives the secret away.  A mule is
about to be executed for her role in an unnatural act.  There was a
time when animals were held as culpable for there actions as humans.
The film takes place in the middle ages.  Colin Firth is a Paris
trained lawyer who has taken up practice in a small town near the
French border.  Much of the film is a play on the city boy in the
country motifs.  With the time left over from his various romances,
Firth uses his new-fangled legal notions as a kind of public defender.
Firth's modern notions of justice simply have no place among the great
(and quite literally) unwashed.  His attempts to use logic in cases
simply confounds the court.  Like modern lawyers, he then has to resort
to exploiting centuries old loopholes to delay cases and waste the
court's money, hoping they will simply drop the case.
     One of his cases, the one the ad implores people not to divulge,
is the trial of a pig for killing a Jewish boy.  From this case we see
many of the popular notions of the Middle Ages, questions of whether
non-Christians are counted as people or something less, of whether the
person is on trial or the evil spirit that compelled the person.
     These legal questions become the backdrop to a well handled
mystery.  For reasons everybody except the advocate seem to know,
everybody wants the pig case disposed of quickly with few questions
asked, except of course, the Gypsies who own the pig.
     The mystery is the heart of this often quite funny and quite
erotic little film.  Although the film takes place on the French
border, it is in English with an excellent cast of mostly Shakespearean
actors.  Besides Firth, Nicol Williamson and Donald Pleasence create
quite believable characters.  Amina Annabi gives a very earthy and
sensual performance as the Gypsy.
      This film was cut from the European original to get an R rating.
In Great Britain it was released as THE HOUR OF THE PIG.

Title
Review for Mrs. Parker and the Vicious Circle (1994)
Directed by Alan Rudolph
Starring- Jennifer Jason Leigh, Campbell Scott, Matthew Broderick,
          Jennifer Beals, Andrew McCarthy, Wallace Shawn, Peter Gallagher,
          Martha Plimptom, Stephen Baldwin, Keith Carradine
Screenplay by Rudolph & Randy Sue Coburn
Produced by Robert Altman
     It would seem that the makers of ED WOOD and the makers of MRS.
PARKER got their scripts mixed up.  ED WOOD was about a fun film about
an interesting group of celebrities.  MRS. PARKER is a downbeat film
about somebody declining into alcoholism and failure.
     MRS. PARKER AND THE VICIOUS CIRCLE can be seen as a companion
piece to Rudolph's 1988 film THE MODERNS.  The jazz age cultural elite
of New York, instead of Paris, is prominently featured.  Instead of the
Paris cafe scene, the main setting is the dining room of the Algonquin
Hotel.  Anybody who was anybody seemed to sit at one table there.
Dorothy Parker, Robert Benchley, George S.  Kaufman, and Edna Ferber
were among the most notable.  The 'good natured' sarcasm of the critics
and playwrights assembled still turns up to fill the small stray spaces
of magazines.
     From this group, Rudolph focuses on verse poet Dorothy Parker and
erudite humorist Robert Benchley.  Jennifer Jason Leigh and Campbell
Scott respectively turn in fine subdued performances in the lead
roles.  Leigh gets a lot out of her emotionally distant Dorothy Parker
character that always has to be ready with a verbal barb.  Scott
manages to find a level of insecurity in Robert Benchley, the face
behind the mask.  Most of the other roles in the film are just cameos,
people that Parker and Benchley encounter along the way and fail to
connect with.  Wallace Shawn has an amusing turn as the Algonquin
waiter.  Keith Carradine, star of THE MODERNS, turns up very briefly as
Will Rogers.
     The plot of the film is very loosely structured, so much so that
it can hardly be called a plot at all.  Days at the Algonquin when
famous people turned up to say famous lines are punctuated by Dorothy
Parker's increasing dependence on liquor and empty sexual encounters.
Her later years, in black and white, are intercut with her pastel
colored memories of her time in the national eye.  It is more a series
of events than a story.  And while we often see the characters drink,
we seldom see them write.
     Both as a double character study and a recreation of bygone era
MRS. PARKER AND THE VICIOUS CIRCLE is quite successful.  It avoids the
common tendency to automatically deify the subject of the film.  Quite
to the contrary, depicting the human failings of the famous people of
the jazz age seems to be the project of the film.  The famous witty
jabs somehow don't seem quite as funny when the nature of the "vicious
circle" is revealed.  Mostly they become forced vain attempts at
comraderie.
     As with all of Rudolph's work, the film is visually stunning if
perhaps a little slowly paced.  The audience for the film is also
perhaps a small one.  Watching the film evokes the same feeling as
reading New Yorker magazine, which published work from Dorothy Parker
and others depicted.  If you don't enjoy one, you probably won't enjoy
the other.

Title
Review for Jefferson in Paris (1995)
Director: James Ivory
Producer: Ismail Merchant
Written by Ruth Prawer Jhabvala
Starring: Nick Nolte, Greta Scacchi, James Earl Jones
A Touchstone and Merchant Ivory Productions Presentation
     Merchant-Ivory Productions have carved out a niche for themselves
in costume dramas.  Usually they are adaptations of classic or toney
contemporary novels that explore class distinctions amid opulent
surroundings.  JEFFERSON IN PARIS is their first effort in a long time
not to be based on a well-known novel.  It is based loosely on a few
historical incidents that lack any real narrative force.  The poorly
focused dramatic structure, odd casting,  and slipshod approach to
history sink this lavishly produced period spectacle.
    The visual centerpiece of the film, featured prominently in the
ads, points out several of the problems in the film.  The scene is of
a hot air Montgolfier balloon demonstration staged for the king of
France.  The balloon wafts through the screen to the delight of all
those watching.  Jefferson (Nick Nolte); himself an inventor, scholar,
and architect; shows virtually no interest in the experiment.  Instead
he sneaks off with the married Mrs. Cosway (Greta Scacchi) to frolic in
the woods and talk of his broken heart.  This first flight with a live
cargo was the 18th century equivalent of the moon landing, and a noted
scholar shows no interest in it.  It is just a visual diversion used as
a backdrop for speculative romantic scenes.  Historically, the scene
plays even worse.  The experiment for King Louis XVI really took place
a year before Jefferson even arrived in Paris.
    The rest of the first half of the film is a series of constant
introductions to names dimly remembered from history class.  Lafayette
has a somewhat large role.  Others like royal consort Marie Antoinette,
King Louis XVI, charlatan Anton Mesmer and inventor Joseph Guillotine
turn up for heavy handed cameos.  With the parade of unneeded
characters in their elaborate silken outfits, much of the film plays
like an audio visual guided tour of a wax museum.  The stiff and
lifeless performances of many of the cast reinforce the waxworks
notion.
    Nick Nolte never manages to be convincing as Jefferson throughout
any of these diverse encounters.  When questioned about the particulars
of the Declaration of Independence he fumbles for answers like a C
student that forgot to cram for a test.  He does not appear to be the
man that actually wrote it.  A few times in the film he putters with
one of his various inventions, but seems more like a man that bought a
useless tool at a garage sale.  What exactly he is doing as minister to
France is never clear.  If he has official obligations he never attends
to them.  Mostly he just flirts with Mrs. Cosway at boring dinner
parties.  In real life Jefferson was noted for his witty dinner
conversation.  That is not evident in this production.
    The second half of the film manages to come to life slightly thanks
to the arrival of one of Jefferson's slaves from Virginia, Sally
Hemings (played by Thandie Newton).  She is the only one to create a
full fledged vibrant screen character.  She and her brother talk more
convincingly on subjects like freedom than do the rest of the "great
thinkers" in the film combined.  Her portrayal exhibits a little depth,
one persona for in front of her peers (both American slaves and French
servants) and one persona in front of Jefferson and his aristocratic
visitors.
    The story around her character is the most controversial element of
the film.  For years there have been unproven allegations that Thomas
Jefferson had children with his slaves.  The film makers try to tell
this story and distance themselves from it at the same time.  They
distance themselves by creating a framing story for the film.  They are
not saying that this story is true, they are merely relating a story
told by somebody else.  They introduce an African-American  character
named Madison Hemings (James Earl Jones), who late in the 1800s tells
the story that  Thomas Jefferson is his father, rendering the bulk of
the film in flashback.  It is this desire to tell the story and wish to
get away from it that hurt the second half.  The latter part of the
film devolves into a poorly developed love triangle between the widower
Thomas Jefferson, and two teenage girls competing for his affections:
his devoted daughter and his slave.  The film is rated PG-13.  This
rating does not really allow for in depth analysis of adult themes.
The relationship between Jefferson and Sally Hemings is really just
broadly hinted at.  To raise such a controversial story element and
then dance around it as Merchant-Ivory does here is reall a big cop
out.
    Throughout the first part of the film various plot threads are set
up.  The French Revolution is beginning, scientific advances are taking
place, famous artists are at work.  The film makers unfortunately
choose one of the least interesting and least well documented stories
to center on, and then show reluctance to deal with it realistically
anyway.  All of the main characters remain blank ciphers with no
personality and their actions are not clearly motivated by any events
in the story.  JEFFERSON IN PARIS is a lot of lovely sets and fancy
costumes looking desperately for something to be about.

Title
Review for Ed Wood (1994)
Dir: Tim Burton
Starring: Johnny Depp, Martin Landau, Sarah Jessica Parker,
          Patricia Arquette, Jeffrey Jones, Bill Murray
     There are may ways to approach the life of down-and-out
independent producer/director Edward D. Wood, Jr.  The story of his life
has all the scope of a tragedy- hopeful young actor and writer declines
into writing porn novels and dies penniless on a distant friend's
couch.  That Tim Burton and his screen writers could take this tragic
life and make a comic biopic film so full of joie de vivre is somewhat
of an accomplishment.
     The film centers on Wood's best years, those with his big star,
Bela Lugosi.  Depp is fine as Wood, managing to look like him and
boldly presenting himself in angora sweaters and high heels.  Martin
Landau, perhaps the most underrated actor, steals the film completely
as Bela Lugosi, the near death former horror star.  At the New York
Film Festival screening, Landau got endless applause.  He said that he
studies twenty-five Bela Lugosi films, plus interview footage.  Landau
described differences in their acting styles, kindly referring to
Lugosi as "minimalist."  His makeup was designed by Rick Baker.  Johnny
Depp claimed his preparation included watching Ronald Reagan videos for
part of the voice.  Bill Murray said he was unfamiliar with the concept
of preparing for a role.  Vincent D'Onofrio gave a good stab at
portraying Orson Welles (don't ask), but he seems to be dubbed by an
impressionist.
     Director Tim Burton abandoned the saturated color and
expressionist sets of his Batman films.  Ed Wood is in stark black and
white, with a lot of real dingy Hollywood locations.  Much of the film
is lit like Ed Wood's real productions, and played out on sparse barely
decorated sets.  This blends the reality of Wood's life into the
fantasy of his films.  Scenes from his three big classics are matched
perfectly.  The black and white sunlit crumbling facades of the
minuscule studios are a Hollywood that is seldom depicted.
     The film falls into the recent genre of energetic independents
trying to raise money for a film like MY LIFE IS IN TURNAROUND, or
IN THE SOUP.  The extent that Ed Wood goes to make his films, and the
truly bizarre raft of Hollywood would-be's that he accumulates
transcends the bounds of the making a film genre.  If these characters
were not certifiably real, they would not be believable.
     Almost all biopics of Hollywood stars soft step the stars true
faults.  ED WOOD is no exception.  While Bela Lugosi's addictions are
played up in the film, Ed Wood's real life alcoholism is not
mentioned.  Wood is treated as with an amount of reverence that he
certainly never received in his real life.  Tim Burton also injects an
amount of optimism into the film by showing the production and premiere
of his films from Wood's own hyper enthusiastic perspective.
     The real irony of the film is that some of the acting and
technical elements of the film are so good that there might soon by
Oscars with the name ED WOOD engraved on them.  Landau will certainly
be nominated for playing Bela Lugosi, something that Bela could never
hope for.  Can posthumous Lifetime Achievement awards be far away?
     Those who enjoy the work of the great cinematic individualist Ed
Wood can also check out his recent biography that is the source of the
screenplay, "Nightmare of Ecstasy" by Rudolph Grey.  BRIDE OF THE
MONSTER is the best of Ed Wood's real films.  Bela Lugosi finished that
one.  The much-hyped PLAN NINE FROM OUTER SPACE really does suffer
from the fact that it is constructed around a few short unused clips of
Bela.  GLEN OR GLENDA, also featuring Lugosi, cannot be described but
must be seen to be believed.

Title
Review for Trois couleurs: Rouge (1994)
Dir: Krysztof Kieslowski
Photography: Piotr Sobocinski
Starring: Irene Jacob, Jean-Louis Trintignant, Frederique Feder,
          Jean-Pierre Lorit
     The third of the "Three Colors" trilogy, and according to the
director his final film, is a bleak and downbeat loosely structured
love story. In contrast to the complex revenge plot of WHITE , RED
relies heavily on parallel incidents, coincidences, premonition dreams,
doppelgangers, and superstitious fate to flesh out themes of love,
chance, and privacy. Irene Jacob (DOUBLE LIFE OF VERONIQUE) plays a
Swiss fashion model who by chance encounters retired judge Jean-Louis
Trintignant. Trintignant  is a cold and bitter old man who, like the
protagonist in the much inferior SLIVER, cynically eavesdrops on his
neighbors and expounds on the sorry plight of the human condition. The
talky encounters between them make up the main body of the film, and
their conversations impact on the lives of a small group of minor
characters.
     Following the plan of the trilogy, this film should have been
about fraternity. That theme seems to be interpreted in how people's
lives are intertwined through minor events. A minor mistake that one
character makes, for example, leads to somebody having grandchildren
thirty-five years later. Another character adjusting a car radio sets
much of the story in motion, changing the lives of several characters
permanently.
     Irene Jacob takes a blank sincerity to her role. Her motivation in
the film is called into question by Trintignant's judge character, and
her blankness leaves the answers up to the audience. She, like the
audience, is repulsed and fascinated by Trintignant's callousness and
voyeurism. Trintignant, one of France's leading actors, projects an
almost palpable air of bitter dejection and moral decay.
     What helps to unify this film is the use of red. Cinematographer
Piotr Sobocinski includes it in almost every scene. It is in banners
and photographs, costumes, slot machines, cars; any conceivable place.
A special lighting design that required more than twice the lights of
BLUE and WHITE combined also brings unity to the film.
     RED provides some interesting insight on the nature of everyday
encounters and chance meetings, but not without some heavy handed
foreshadowing and polemic speeches. It is a challenging film that may
not satisfy the fans of Kieslowski's more mainstream and humorous
WHITE. It does fall well within the tradition of European post new-wave
cinema, and is in some ways reminiscent of Godard's early color work.
     After the screening at the New York Film Festival, director
Kieslowski, through the aid of an interpreter, answered questions.
Typical of European directors, he did not say much. When asked about
the unifying  theme of the trilogy, he said that if you find a theme
there is a theme, if you don't there isn't. When asked about the three
films of the trilogy being so different, he said that it was the
distributor's idea to call the films a trilogy. When asked about being
an artist, he said that he was merely  a technician. When asked about
the film's stylistics, he said that it was due to the cinematographer.
When asked about cinematic influences, he said he never went to the
movies anymore. He also dodged questions about the meaning of the end
of the film. He did say that he was retiring from film making, and did
not know what he was going to do next. Kieslowski seems full of energy
for an aging man, and hopefully a few months of retirement will make
him want to return to work.

Title
Review for Basketball Diaries, The (1995)
Directed by Scott Kalvert
Based on the memoir by Jim Carroll
Starring Leonardo DiCaprio, Bruno Kirby, Lorraine Bracco, Mark Wahlberg
     The motion picture camera just loves some people.  Leonardo
DiCaprio is one such person.  Put him in a scene, any scene, and he
becomes the center of attention.  You have to go back to James Dean or
the young Robert DeNiro to find somebody that had such an easy rappore
with the big screen.  In his first top-billed role, Leonardo DiCaprio
has come to the forefront of young American actors.
     Mark Wahlberg, the artist formerly known as Marky Mark, proves
himself to be a good character actor.  He catches a gritty, streetwise
flavor that lends a sorely needed sense of authenticity to THE
BASKETBALL DIARIES.  Wahlberg might have found his niche is punky tough
guy roles.  No doubt, he will be artfully reprising this kind of
character for years to come.
     Juliette Lewis is a more versatile actor.  She risks falling into
typecasting by doing another version of the white trash character that
she has done in her last several films.  These performances, along with
fine work by Bruno Kirby and Ernie Hudson are a few of the reasons to
see THE BASKETBALL DIARIES.  Unfortunately, the reasons not to see the
film are a much longer and more convincing list.
     Jim Carroll's classic novel of coming of age in the 1960s is
transposed into the 1990s.  All of the flavor of Carroll's novel gets
lost among a series of anachronisms.  One character finds a beat-up
revolver, and this makes him a tough guy on the street.  Much more
powerful weapons have been common for years among ever younger
criminals.  The teenagers get high on furniture polish, when in the
1990s real drugs are readily available everywhere in New York.  Current
urban problems like crack and AIDS are not mentioned in the film.  A
major scene takes place in a subway bathroom, when subway bathrooms
have been shuttered for over a decade.  Even the whole sense of the
young white Catholic schoolboys going around New York in his school
uniform has vanished through waves of white flight to the suburbs.  If
the story needed to be updated, a better job needed to be done.  It
seems as if the film makers were simply too cheap to paint over the
graffiti and rent the old cars for the street scenes.  Relocating the
story from the middle class north of Manhattan to the seedy Lower East
Side also didn't add anything more to the story except a bunch of
cliches.
     Those complaints aside, some of which perhaps would only annoy
native New Yorkers, the film stumbles badly in its overall structure.
Jim Carroll's book is a series of loosely related incidents.  The film
makers change it into a linear anti-drug story that is not really
faithful to the books irreverent and wistful tone.  Beautifully funny
scenes of teenagers causing trouble become turgid episodes in REEFER
MADNESS like anti-heroin cautionary tale.  A judgmental Reagan era
just-say-no feeling has been injected into the aimless and amoral
goings on of Carroll's life.  Anybody that saw the German film
CRISTIANE F. has seen this all before.
     Director Scott Kalvert's experience as a rock video director is
evident in a few disjointed scenes.  Narrative elements become filler
between psychedelic montages set to alternative rock music.  A scene of
a burning basketball hoop is a great image, but it seems forced into
the story just to create a good rock video effect.  Some of the music
comes from Jim Carroll's own band.  These images will probably wind up
in rock videos that will be better than the film.  The sound track album
is by far better than the film too.
    A better attempt at adapting an unadaptable novel about street
life in New York was done with LAST EXIT TO BROOKLYN featuring
Jennifer Jason Leigh.  Martin Scorcese's MEAN STREETS also creates a
much more coherent and authentic urban vision, using much of the same
cut-to-the-beat technique.  For an anti-drug film that manages to be
good cinema, Otto Preminger's THE MAN WITH THE GOLDEN ARM is still tops
in the genre.

Title
Review for Terminal Velocity (1994)
     TERMINAL VELOCITY is basically a Summer picture.  As the title
implies it has a lot of high speed action.  Buena Vista, the film's
distributor, might have felt that it was too slight to compete with
TRUE LIES or SPEED, and they have now dumped it in the middle of Oscar
season hoping to get something out of it as counter programming.
     TERMINAL VELOCITY succeeds as a slight diversion.  Charlie Sheen
plays a cynical loser, an athlete screwed over by cold war politics.
Enough of his lines are funny, more funny than Arnold or Sly have been
recently, to qualify this as an action comedy.  Sheen manages to be
just dumb enough without going over the edge into parody.  The audience
can feel relatively smart by being a step or two ahead of Sheen without
feeling that Sheen is just too stupid to see the road in front of his
face.
     What really helps TERMINAL VELOCITY is the presence of Nastassja
Kinski.  After making just a few sporadic art film appearances over the
past several years, she comes off a fresh face.  As lovely and
enigmatic as ever, she is perfect as VERTIGO-esque the mystery woman.
Fans of Nastassja Kinski can only hope that this film marks a true
return after a long hiatus.
     The story itself is a lukewarm rehash of Hitchcock thriller
elements, VERTIGO, NORTH BY NORTHWEST, and THE 39 STEPS in particular,
with bits of CALL NORTHSIDE 777 and other films thrown in.  The score
(by Joel McNeely) is quite reminiscent of Bernard Herrmann's Hitchcock
scores.  The action moves fast enough to be enjoyable..  Much of the
film involves sky-diving and plane stunts, which are difficult to make
boring.  In fact, some of the stunts ar quite hair-raising even if they
are obvious blue screen shots.  Add in a few nasty villains including
the creepy QUIZ SHOW announcer (Christopher McDonald), and a halfway
decent action film is almost guaranteed.  It is only after the film is
over that the inconsistencies of the plot become bothersome.
      I would like to give the filmmakers credit for at least coming
up with a post-Cold War thriller plot that uses planes in the
Southwest, but does not involve cheesy South American drug lords.

Title
Review for Death and the Maiden (1994)
Directed by Roman Polanski
Starring- Sigourney Weaver, Ben Kingsley, and Stuart Wilson
Based on the play by Ariel Dorfman
     The title immediately alerts one that they are possibly in for a
heavy handed modern allegorical polemic, with an actor standing each
for each of the title characters.  Actually there are three
characters.  The characters are a victim, a judge, and an accused
fascist; all stranded in an isolated cabin.  The setting is an Unnamed
South American Country.  The subject at hand is the aftermath of
totalitarianism.  It sounds like Sartre's "No Exit" or Jean Genet's
"The Balcony," existential dramas that were brilliant nearly half a
century ago, but old hat to anybody who has read a book recently.
     And it probably would be except for the fact that it is directed
by Roman Polanski.  All of Polanski's best films deal with a small
group of characters trapped together, with one character trapped even
further, trapped in their own mind.  KNIFE IN THE WATER and BITTER MOON
trap the people on boats; REPULSION,  THE TENANT and ROSEMARY'S BABY
trap people in their urban apartments.  CUL DE SAC, and his new film
DEATH AND THE MAIDEN, trap people in the false complacency of suburban
life.
     Nobody but Polanski could create so much tension in the throw away
opening scene.  Sigourney Weaver is preparing dinner, but in a tank top
and boxer shorts.  The audience is put in an uncomfortable voyeuristic
position, wanting to leave and wanting to watch.  We have collectively
intruded on a private moment, and continue intruding.  Something subtle
about the camera movement makes this different from other opening
scenes.  Her unawareness of our watching makes it almost as if we were
stalking her in her own home.  Just as this gets to be a little creepy,
the radio announces that hearings by the new government will look into
the death squad killings of a previous regime.  Sigourney Weaver
listens with particular interest, and a storm knocks out the
electricity and the phone.
     Here is where the casting is truly perfect.  One might expect the
actress in the darkened isolated house to succumb to any number of weak
female cliches, but all the audience knows that Sigourney Weaver, in
similar attire, single handedly defeated the Alien on several
occasions.  Whatever the deposed dictatorship can put up against her is
going to be in for quite a fight.
     What turns up in the middle of the storm is Ben Kingsley, best
known as Ghandi.  In our minds a saintly man, Kingsley denies that he
was in the country at all during the death-squad era.  Torture victim
Weaver has a different opinion.  Subconsciously one still roots for
their previous characters.  We hope Weaver destroys the Alien, and
Kingsley rises above repression.  One of the most claustrophobic and
tense ninety minutes of cinema follows.  Nobody but Polanski could use
the simple tricks that create the emotional roller-coaster ride and
have it not seem corny.  The storm knocking out the power routine was
old when movies first learned to talk.  The film is so riveting that
one forgets how much of a cliche it is.
     The dimly lit naturalistic set and particularly grainy film lend a
home-movie reality to the story.  It is a sense of reality that works
well.  The horror film cliche set-up gives way to the horror of
Twentieth Century life: tortures and disappearances, followed by
cover-ups and silence.
     The play is full of purple prose, and the inevitable 'what makes
us different from them?' speeches.  Polanski races past all of that
quickly.  Much more time is spent on dribbling out the details of what
supposedly happened fifteen years ago, and what Weaver intends to do
about it now.  As Weaver reveals details of her torture, we are again
put in the uncomfortable position of eavesdropper.  Our listening
intrudes on her innermost privacy, and forces us to identify, uneasily,
with Kingsley, the accused arch-intruder of her life.
     While much attention paid to details throughout the tense dimly
lit cabin scenes, the few studio made exterior scenes are very crude.
Less than sophisticated matte shots unconvincingly place the characters
outside the cabin.  While perhaps unintentional, it does frame these
more pointed scenes as staged existentialism, separate from the drama
of the cabin.  Even the scenes on the porch, with the
forced-perspective prop lighthouse blinking in the "distance," seem
distinctly removed from the real life horror of the interior
situation.  The subtle staginess diffuses the awkward unnaturalness of
some of the Ariel Dorfman's more political dialogue.
     A couple of years Polanski turned down Speilberg's invitation to
direct SCHINDLER'S LIST.  He felt the subject matter, which intersected
with his own life, was too personal for him to direct.  This film deals
with the same fascist themes on a microcosmic scale.  DEATH AND THE
MAIDEN is the work of a world class film maker at the peak of his
form.  With two top notch films in one year, at least according to the
US distribution dates, this marks a major comeback.

Title
Review for Amateur (1994)
Dir: Hal Hartley
Starring Isabelle Huppert, Martin Donovan, Elina Lowensohn, Damian Young
     Hal Hartley's films are often compared to early Jean Luc Godard.
This effort is his most Godardian, down to the casting of French
actress Isabelle Huppert.  The plot is something like PIERROT LE FOU
meets NORTH BY NORTHWEST.  Hartley takes the New Wave themes of love,
money and religion and embodies them in an ex-nun who tries to write
pornography, accountants turned hitmen, an amnesiac, and a grown up
child porn star.  All of these people are mixed up in an international
plot based in Amsterdam involving a MacGuffin, some floppy disks.
    The title not only to Huppert's character being an amateur writer,
but other characters amateurish attempts at blackmail and other
crimes.  The film is also shot, quite intentionally, in an amateurish
style.  The fun story, while quite humorous, is quite contrived.  The
acting is very toned down to a dry deadpan.  All of the film, including
scenes set in upstate New York, was shot in Manhattan.  The film is
entirely in close-up and no attempt is made to develop space according
to normal Hollywood rules.  The overall effect is that of watching a
prolonged student project, but of course a very good one.
     The lack of normal spatial development creates a disjointed view
of New York.  No landmarks are seen except Grand Central Station, a
location from NORTH BY NORTHWEST.  It is not until the characters
mention it, that it is clear that the location of the film even is New
York.  Hartley presents a deconstructed New York of alleys, diners,
abandoned buildings, stairways, that could be anywhere.  They are
generic crime drama locations.
      Comedy in the film comes from the banality of the conversation.
Hitmen discuss the shortcomings of various cellular phone models, porn
publishers decry their lost dreams of making an important statement.  A
policewoman goes on and on to confused missing persons until fellow
officers tell her to get a grip.  While the film is funny, there are no
real jokes per se.
     The adult themes of pornography are dealt with in a subdued way.
The film avoids being a sleazy low budget excuse for nudity.  In fact
considering that some of the characters are obsessed with sex, the film
has very little sex and no nudity.  This helps to keep the film focused
on the characters.
     Isabelle Huppert said that her participation in the project grew
from a fan letter.  She wrote to Hal Hartley after seeing his film
TRUST.  She said that she would like to work in more American
independent films.  She pointed out a similarity in the way that
Hartley and her long time mentor Godard work.  Both allow for
spontaneity during rehearsals but want something very precise during
filming.  The film was shot over six weeks after a five week rehearsal
and is funded in part by American Playhouse, a division of public
television.
     A low-budget film like this one is certainly not for the same
audience that revels in the action scenes of SPEED or TRUE LIES.  If
you prefer the classics of the French New Wave to modern Hollywood, I
recommend THE AMATEUR very highly.  Hartley is trying to keep the
spirit of the New Wave alive.

Title
Review for Don Quixote (1992)
DON QUIJOTE DE ORSON WELLES (DON QUIXOTE OF ORSON WELLES)
Produced, written, directed by Orson Welles
Cast: Francisco Perez, Akim Tamiroff, Orson Welles, 
Editor and head of post production: Jess Franco
Mexico/Italy/ Spain 1955-1969, Post Production Spain 1992
     When Orson Welles died almost ten years ago he left several nearly
finished but unreleased films.  Most Famous of these is THE OTHER SIDE
OF THE WIND, tied up in a legal dispute with Iranian financiers.  Other
projects included the fragments of IT'S ALL TRUE, his aborted
documentary on Brazil; and a film called THE DEEP, apparently similar
to the recent DEAD CALM.  Most legendary and speculatively exiting of
the projects is DON QUIXOTE.  Over the years this unseen project has
gained a reputation as one of his best films, because the match of
Welles and the character of Cervantes' novel seemed perfect.  Welles
used his own money, completely, and between 1955 and 1969 filmed enough
footage to make at least three films, changing his concept constantly.
If any of these films would have been a masterpiece, it is impossible
to say.  The project currently being screened by his former long time
companion Oja Kaddar, who has the rights to his unfinished projects, is
an insult to the memory of a sometimes brilliant director.
     Technical considerations make this film close to unwatchable.  A
film consists of nothing more than a visual or image track, and a sound
track.  The visual track of this film is incredibly poor.  It seems as
if, and this is a guess, an early rough cut of  film was transferred to
primitive home video some time in the sixties.  This poorly focused and
washed out video then was retransferred to film.  The result is
something not as good as the "Lost Episodes" of the Honeymooners TV
show.  Cut into this are a few better quality close-ups.  An occasional
original quality shot sneaks in, reminding one of the great visual
quality of other Welles films.  This poor footage makes up most of the
film.  About three quarters of the way through, there is a very good
twenty minutes of high quality footage of the running of the bulls in
Spain.  Welles appears in this, making a film called DON QUIXOTE.
Henry Fonda can also be seen briefly.  The film the returns to poor
quality images as the editors struggle to make an ending out of the
available footage.  The running of the bulls section seems to be edited
by Welles, or at least a professional.  The rest, the mixture of poor
quality footage, lacks any sense of pacing or focus.  The cut in close
ups are obviously left over scraps used to stretch out the scenes to
accommodate the narration.
     The audio track of the film is even worse.  Bad sound plagued
Welles later works.  Why a film maker who got his start in radio and
made sound innovations on his early Hollywood films used such poor
sound technique in later life is a subject of speculation among film
scholars.  Many film makers shooting in Spain and Italy in the sixties
did not use direct sound, since the films would be dubbed for different
markets.  As a result, Welles shot most of this film silent, hoping to
use his own voice for the English language version.  He recorded about
ten minutes.  The rest of the sound was created in post production.  It
is an incredibly poor dubbing job that would not pass muster in a
kung-fu film.  The head of modern post production was Jess Franco.  His
own films include the women's prison film 99 WOMEN and horror opus
NIGHT OF THE BLOOD MONSTER.  His team added a flat and hollow track
of bored actors trudging through the dialogue, making no effort to
match the lips of characters.  It is difficult to tell if some lines
are supposed to be narration or dialogue.  This is accompanied by stock
sound effects and almost no music.  It is like watching the 'Here's
Harold' television versions of Harold Lloyd shorts.
     The climactic scene of the film, jousting the windmills, is
created by matting a long shot of the actors on their burros over
stills, similar to some of the "restoration" Georgio Moroder did on
METROPOLIS.
     I doubt that this version will get any distribution in the US.
For Welles fans I will recount the basic storyline.  The story of the
film, as it is in this version, has Don Quixote and Sancho Panza in
armor wandering through the landscape until all of a sudden they
encounter a woman, (Oja Kaddar) on a motorcycle.  It is Franco-era
Spain.  They encounter several modern people, mistake sheep for an
army, joust windmills, etc.  Don Quixote and Sancho Panza then split
up.  Sancho Panza hears that Orson Welles is making a film about Don
Quixote.  Panza wanders through the running of the bulls looking for
Orson Welles, who might know where Don Quixote is, or have a use for
him in his film.  After encountering Welles, Sancho Panza finds Don
Quixote.  People recognize him Don Quixote as the guy from the book.
He passes a Don Quixote restaurant and a Don Quixote Beer sign.  They
wander off again into the distance.
     If the images can be digitally cleaned up, and the sound recorded
by true professionals, with a solid score and convincing sound effects,
this film would make an interesting footnote to Welles career.  As it
is, this version should be avoided by all but serious film scholars
that need to see what Welles possibly had in mind.  Compared to the
brilliant OTHELLO; recently cleaned up and restored; DON QUIJOTE DE
ORSON WELLES looks like PLAN NINE FROM OUTER SPACE.

Title
Review for Radioland Murders (1994)
Director: Mel Smith
Starring: Mary Stuart Masterson, Brian Benben, Ned Beatty,
          Scott Michael Campbell, Michael Lerner, Michael McKean,
          Jeffrey Tambor, Christopher Lloyd, Bobcat Goldthwait
Story by George Lucas, Executive Producer- George Lucas
     Another long awaited comeback from George Lucas is another dismal
disappointment.  This attempt to recapture the spirit of thirties B-film
mystery thrillers quickly crumbles into a series of unfunny jokes and
unwelcome cameos.  It is only for a few minutes near the very end that
any sense of plot is developed, and those few minutes are not enough to
erase the tedium of the hour and a half that preceded them.
    The film is set in 1939 on the opening day of a new radio network.
The old big studios used to like the Big Broadcast plot because it gave
them an excuse to parade their comic and musical talent.  Much of the
material the talent used was their own, so the cost of developing a
script was greatly reduced.  A flimsy plot could be structured around
the jokes and songs, and a B-film was halfway home.  A few art deco
sets, and a crowd pleaser was guaranteed.
    This film certainly assembles a lot of talent, but then quickly
fails to give them anything to do.  Harvey Korman is passed out under a
desk for most of the film.  Christopher Lloyd and Robert Klein don't
even have any lines.  Bobcat Goldthwait, much to the detriment of the
film does.  One hopes in vain that he will be the first victim in a
string of humorous station murders.  He is not.  His endless drone
serves to underscore the complete lack of humor in the comedy.  The
basic level of comedy in the film is having somebody run down the hall
with last minute script changes, only to be hit in the nose with a door
and drop the pages, get tripped and drop the pages again.  This pale
ghost of slapstick occurs repeatedly.
     The two leads, Masterson and Benben play a bickering husband and
wife who both work at the station.  Their lack of chemistry and comic
timing makes one long for Abbott and Costello in WHO DONE IT?, the
film this is clearly trying to be.  While there are stand-up comics
everywhere in the film, from the elevator operator to the torch
singer's husband; Masterson and Benben are not a comic team.  That is
what the film sorely needs.
    Even a great comic team, though would have had to struggle to wring
the laughs out of this script.  In the opening scene, station owner Ned
Beatty throws the radio show's script back at the writers and says that
it isn't funny.  Advice that the makers of this film could have taken to
heart as well
     If the backstage scenes fail, the onstage scenes work a little
better.  Spinal Tap's Michael McKean portrays a Spike Jones band leader
and manages to do for big band music what he has done before for rock
and roll.  George Burns and Rosemary Cluney, veterans of the original
radio show films, make brief appearances.  A few talented actors do soap
opera, science fiction, and thriller stories for the live audience.
Just when these stories get good, the films leaves them and returns to
the less amusing back stage antics.  Even the Andrews Sisters
impersonators are a relief from the ingratiating Bobcat Goldthwait.
     Set and costume design are the film's main plusses.  Just like the
recent SHADOW, this film recreates the look of the thirties very
successfully.  As with THE SHADOW, one is left puzzled why the film
makers bothered to try to recreate obscure thirties cultural relics
without making the films at least as interesting as the originals.It
seems in both cases, and DICK TRACY as well, the main concern was the
visual , and not the narrative element.
      Woody Allen's new film, BULLETS OVER BROADWAY is a much funnier
attempt at a backstage comedy set in the art deco period.  Allen's
RADIO DAYS also recaptures the era with more feeling and wit.  Three
classical era Hollywood films that are much better are THE BIG CLOCK
with Ray Milland and Charles Laughton, INTERNATIONAL HOUSE with Burns
and Allen, and WHO DONE IT? with Abbott and Costello.

Title
Review for Natural Born Killers (1994)
Dir: Oliver Stone
Starring Woody Harrelson, Juliette Lewis, Robert Downey Jr.
Tommy Lee Jones, Rodney Dangerfield
A Regency Film distributed by Warner Bros.
     Oliver Stone's new film is a nonstop barrage of pop cultures'
images.  Like a two-hour rock video, the film switches from grainy black
and white, hand held home color, wavy video transfer, and professional
35mm film.  Each medium brings with it its own way of contemplating the
story.  Mallory's (Juliette Lewis) abusive childhood is presented on
video with a laugh track.  Her wedding to serial killer Mickey (Woody
Harrelson) is in home movie color.  Their spree across the West is
presented as a bad movie; they sit in a prop car in front of an
undisguised rear screen projector showing stock footage of different
roads.  Some scenes even include their own commercials.  Other scenes
simulate switching channels with a remote and landing on the story of
Mickey and Mallory, the murdering couple who take the  place of James
Dean and Marilyn Monroe in the hearts of 90s youth.
     While this technique of story telling is functional and sometimes
interesting, director Stone's choice of making the actors play their
lines for broad comedy is less successful.  Harrelson and Lewis manage
to pull off their sneering cynicism because it is pretty much in
character.  Rodney Dangerfield's father character manages to parody the
"Father Knows Best" cliches and has a laugh track.  Tommy Lee Jones as
the warden, Stephen Wright as the psychiatrist, Robert Downey Jr. as
the tabloid reporter all fall flat when they mug their lines and
consciously over emote.  As a surrealistic comedy (or perhaps parody of
a comedy) about the callousness and sickness of modern society NATURAL
BORN KILLERS does not succeed.
       In his scatter shot approach, there are other levels to the
film.  As a social commentary on the media the film is a little better.
It is difficult to have sympathy for the media characters who prey on
the same carcasses as the serial killers.  The fans of Mickey and
Mallory strike a much more realistic note considering the fans of
recent tabloid criminals.
      Besides using a variety of filming styles and techniques, Stone
cuts in a variety of stock footage from everything from "Leave It to
Beaver" to THE WILD BUNCH.  Music in the soundtrack is also diverse and
supportive, including everything from Jane's Addiction to Leonard
Cohen.  Among all these sounds and images, Mickey and Mallory fit right
in.  The problem with the film is that all too often they get lost in
the mix.
     Juliette Lewis plays a similar role in last year's KALIFORNIA, a
similar and more coherent film, if a less adventurous one.  Two other
serial killer couple films worth checking out on tape are THE HONEYMOON
KILLERS with Tony LoBianco and BADLANDS with Martin Sheen and Sissy
Spacek.

Title
Review for Pura formalitŕ, Una (1994)
Cowritten and directed by Giuseppe Tornatore
Starring Gerard Depardieu, Roman Polanski
     Polanski has been spending quite a lot of time recently in
storm-isolated houses. The rains come, the phone goes dead, the
power eventually goes out. A stranded wanderer gets interrogated
about his life. The first time Polanski was in such a house this
year was as the director of the intriguing DEATH AND THE MAIDEN.
This second time he is in the house as an actor. Polanski plays
Inspector Leonardo da Vinci in the film A PURE FORMALITY.
Polanski is a great actor who too seldom plies that craft before
the public.
     Unfortunately, Guiseppe Tornatore  cannot match Polanski's
skill as a director. A PURE FORMALITY achieves little suspense
and only manages for a few brief moments to be even interesting.
 The large bulk of the film takes place in a leaky border zone
police station. Tornatore tries to break up the space by
sticking the camera on the most unlikely places, beneath the
keys of a typewriter, under the water of a toilet bowl, on the
ceiling and so forth.  All this achieves is underscoring that
without tricks the story is of little interest.
     The title is quite apt. The film is nothing more than a
formal exercise in basic existentialism. Some broad clues that
are clumsily thrown out to anybody who knows the least bit about
mythology give away the "surprise ending." The surprise,
however, is not a new one. In fact, to take a phrase from
vaudeville, the gag is so old it has whiskers. 1960s TV shows
like The Twilight Zone and Alfred Hitchcock Presents managed to
tell very similar stories in a half hour or hour format. At
close to two hours, A PURE FORMALITY seems heavily padded.
     The basic story (not giving away the 'surprise') involves a
well-known novelist (Gerard Depardieu) running through the
border zone without his papers. He gets arrested and taken to a
station that has a sieve for a roof and little else that works
any better. The novelist's name is Onoff, like on/off. Even
though his picture is well known, nobody recognizes him. Then
Inspector Leonardo da Vinci (Polanski) arrives and quizzes him
for hours about the different characters in his novels. Why?
Because the police have recently found an unidentified body.
Onoff's defense is that he has amnesia. Disjointed images of his
missing hours come back, one of the few successful effects in
the film.
      Depardieu and Polanski are fabulous together on screen.
The leaden paced editing, and ham fisted direction of the film
cannot destroy the magic they create when the story finally
heats up to a tepid simmer. When Polanski starts scoring points
in their literally depicted cat and mouse game, it even seems as
if  the film might be good after all.
     Then the "surprise" ending comes, reminding everyone that
is, as stated in the title, a purely formal rehash of some
rather basic existential motifs. To see Polanski at his best as
an actor, check him out in THE TENANT and CHINATOWN, both of
which he also directed. He also makes appearances in  ANDY
WARHOL'S DRACULA, Andrej Wadja's A GENERATION.

Title
Review for Pręt-ŕ-Porter (1994)
Directed by Robert Altman
Starring: Anouk Aimee, Marcello Mastroianni, Sophia Loren,
          Kim Bassinger, Stephen Rea, Tim Robbins, Julia Roberts,
          Lauren Bacall, Sally Kellerman, Danny Aiello
     Altman has developed a unique style.  His classic films all have
large ensemble casts juggling several intertwining storylines at once,
often talking at the same time.  After taking on the world of politics
in NASHVILLE and the disintegrating California social structure in
SHORT CUTS, lampooning the vapid world of Paris fashion just doesn't
seem to be a worthy enough subject.  Fluff, dissected and scrutinized,
is fluff.  There is very little more to know about it than can be seen
at first glance.
     READY TO WEAR, or PRET A PORTER as the film's title sequence still
says, only has a chance of being moderately satisfying compared to
Altman's classic essays on society.  It does succeed for the most part,
landing at least in the upper half of Altman's work, but least
satisfying of his efforts since his "comeback" with VINCENT AND THEO,
but better than his last Paris lensed outing, BEYOND THERAPY.
     His stories this time are much more loosely connected than last.
In SHORT CUTS a thread of cause and effect could be traced from one
character to the others, Lily Tomlin's accident to the parents to the
cake maker and so forth.  In READY TO WEAR, one simply has to be in
Paris on the days covered to be included in the story.  Several of them
could be removed completely with no effect on the storyline.  Where
characters in SHORT CUTS often delved into their deepest emotions,
READY TO WEAR is all cheap shots, one line barbs.  Nothing in the film
is deep or heartfelt.  Simply as a comedy, it is difficult to tell what
the jokes about the fashion world even are, since the world is so close
to self-parody anyway.  An unpleasant vein of scatological humor runs
through the film as well.
     After a so-so first hour, filled with protracted set-ups and
introductions, the film gets somewhat better.  After what seems to be
an endless bit of airport arrivals and hotel check-ins, several plots
emerge, mostly concerning petty backfighting between different
designers, models, photographers and magazine editors.  Once the
characters and their own personal vacuous goals are established, the
stories get going quickly as a maze of rehearsals and shows that one
either must be seen or not be seen at.  Doing the seeing for us is Kim
Bassinger as Kitty Potter, an MTV-type fashion reporter who seems to be
everywhere trying to get a straight answer from anybody as she reads
her questions from cue cards.
       The ensemble cast for the film is huge.  Many real Paris fashion
icons play themselves, and lent their creations to be used in the
film.  The cast is a who's and who's not list of international talent.
Stephen Rea gives his best performance to date as a jaded photographer
in a stand out role.  European art film stalwarts Marcello Mastroianni,
Sophia Loren, Anouk Aimee and Jean-Pierre Cassel bring warmth to their
story, and it is a large portion of the film.  Lauren Bacall, Lyle
Lovett,  Tim Robbins, Julia Roberts, Teri Garr and Danny Aiello are
among several stars really wasted in side stories that never get to be
quite amusing enough.
       By the end, more of the stories hit than miss.  It becomes
amusing to see what new depths of shallowness some of the characters
will sink to in their petty back stage games.  Even the message scene
at the end is amusing for its shallowness at making a deep statement
about fashion.
     Compared to most of the films that came out of Hollywood this
year, READY TO WEAR is better than most, but once it is over it is as
forgettable as last year's platform shoes.  Ultimately it is as shallow
as the world it is commenting on.

Title
Review for Huozhe (1994)
Dir: Zhang Yimou
Starring: Ge You, Gong Li, Niu Ben, Guo Tao
Based on the novel by Yu Hau
Winner of Best Actor and Grand Jury Prizes at Cannes
ERA International Films in association with Shanghai Film Studios
     Zhang Yimou helped put Mainland Chinese cinema on the world map.
He is one of the leaders of China's "fifth generation" of  film
makers.  JU DUO and RAISE THE RED LANTERN both told tragic period
stories in visually colorful settings.  His new project, TO LIVE; or as
it appears on the film itself, LIFETIMES; attempts to expand his
horizons from telling simple period tales to telling an epic  covering
all of recent Chinese history.
     TO LIVE follows the life of a decadent gambler's family from the
waning days of the Nationalist Government through the Communist
Revolution, the Great Leap Forward, the Cultural Revolution, and its
aftermath.  Each of these eras is set off by a separate title.  The
events of this family's life are picked up and continued with
characters being a decade older.
     The drama is quite touching but increasingly turns from being a
clever and original story full of sharp plot twists to being a story of
predictable plot devices.  The odd events that bring the gambler from
being a rich man to being an itinerant puppet master become in the
second half of the film a series of standard family tragedies.  The
film is best when it tries to convey the paranoia of the post-
revolution chaos.  Characters are aware that missing an important rally
could mean the suggestion of being counter-revolutionary, and
ultimately death.  The film is worst when it tries to personalize the
events of the Great Leap Forward and Cultural Revolution routine
melodrama.  Zhang Yimou's other films are notable for brilliant and
vibrant color schemes.  Much of this film is in a drab blue and grey,
the omnipresent colors of the post-revolution village and villagers.
     Somewhat compensating for this are several truly engaging
performances by Ge You as the one time gambler and Gong Li as his
wife.  They, and all the cast, depict their characters with extreme
conviction.  The settings, from colorful mansions to drab communal
buildings are also entirely credible if not always visually
interesting.  The ability of the characters to find elements of joy in
their increasingly chaotic lives is also a theme of the film that is
well realised.  Through all of the turbulence of historical events
depicted, the main characters manage to experience the full range of
human emotion.  They manage as the title suggests, to live.
     All of this is not to say the film is not good, but following so
closely on the heels of the very similar FAREWELL MY CONCUBINE it is
by comparison a disappointment.  That film gets much more mileage out
of the Chinese opera than this film gets out of puppet shows.  FAREWELL
MY CONCUBINE also builds up to higher and more significant
crescendos.  The terror of the Cultural Revolution is more real in
FAREWELL MY CONCUBINE because more of the action is on screen.  In
TO LIVE, much of that action is off screen, people run to and from
events that we do not see.  Bernardo Bertolucci's THE LAST EMPEROR,
not strictly speaking a Chinese film, also covers many of the same
events with more emotion and visual impact.  I recommend TO LIVE, but
it covers already well trod ground in a sometimes too predictable way.

Title
Review for Enfer, L' (1994)
Director: Claude Chabrol
Starring: Emmanuelle Beart, Francios Cluzet
Original screenplay by Henri-Georges Clouzot
This film has not been rated.
     Claude Chabrol was once the driving force behind the French New
Wave. A family inheritance gave him the money to abandon magazine
writing and produce his own films and those of others. His fellow
Cahiers du Cinema writers: Eric Rohmer,  Francios Truffaut, and Jean
Luc Godard soon followed him. Over the next fifteen years the four of
them turned out some of the most impressive films in history. Chabrol
gained the reputation of being the "French Hitchcock." Many of his
films dealt with characters driven to obsession, sometimes even
murder.  Buzzwords for describing his films always included cold,
analytical, detached. His films had little of Hitchcock's trademark
humor. Instead they were simple slice-of-life accounts of characters
becoming unwound.
     Henri-Georges Clouzot, who died in 1977, was also referred to as
the "French Hitchcock". His career is earlier than Chabrol's. His
classics include the original don't-give-away-the-secret-ending film,
DIABOLIQUE, and the taught action thriller WAGES OF FEAR. His ill
health forced him to abandon filming his script for L'ENFER in 1964.
     Just like in Hollywood, France is now relying on retreading safe
existing projects. The thirty year old script for L'ENFER has been
dusted off, given a nineties polish, and put on the big screen. The
resulting film, while neither Chabrol's nor Clouzot's best, is still
good enough considering the famine of watchable French art films  these
days.
     The film evokes Chabrol's early work. A few characters are trapped
in the confines of their own mental shortcomings.  The title roughly
translates to 'the inferno' or 'hell'. The hell is the obsessive
jealousness that lakeside resort owner, played by Francios Cluzet,
feels toward his flirty wife, played by the beautiful Emmanuelle
Beart.
     The truth of what is going is hard to discern, since the film is
most often told from the point of view a psychologically challenged
character who cannot tell fact from obsessive fantasy. The clues, the
overheard words, the remembered incidents, are all suspect of mental
tampering. There is no one correct way to read the 'facts' presented in
the film. Each viewer must decide what has really gone on. If in the
end it is too neatly contrived to be satisfying, at least it gives the
audience credit for being able to think on a complex level.
     What ultimately makes the film worthwhile is Emmanuelle Beart. She
has the difficult task of being a completely ambiguous character, whose
uncertain actions are the core of the film. Francios Cluzet turns in a
completely serviceable performance as the obsessed man. The minor
characters of hotel guests and townspeople all seem natural and
believable in low key performances. Emmanuelle Beart has an odd
connection the screenwriter Henri-Georges Clouzot. Clouzot directed the
original 1949 French version of MANON OF THE SPRING, and Beart stars
in the remake.
     Chabrol is at his analytical best, following characters around
like an invisible voyeur, never cracking a smile, never telling a joke,
never looking away from the unpleasantness. If you happen to catch
L'ENFER and find it interesting, Chabrol's best early work is LES
BICHES, LA RUPTURE, LE BOUCHER.  Among his English language efforts are
TEN DAY'S WONDER with Orson Welles and Anthony Perkins, and BLOOD
RELATIVES with Donald Sutherland..

Title
Review for Bad Company (1995/I)
Starring Laurence Fishburne, Ellen Barkin, Frank Langella, Spalding Gray
Written by Ross Thomas
Directed by Damian Harris
     It takes guts to come straight out and put the word 'bad' right in
the title.  It's like waving a red flag in of a bull.  It challenges
wags such as myself to come up with witty bon mots about how the film
is aptly named, list the bad parts of the film and compare it to other
self proclaimed 'bad' films.  The problem is that BAD COMPANY isn't
really bad so much as it is simply mediocre.  It's not great cinema,
but it is halfway decent trash.
     The story is some nonsense about renegade ex-secret agents and a
murder/blackmail operation run by Frank Langella.  It never quite
manages to generate any interest.  The double and triple crosses are
simply by the book plot twists.  Since there is no reason to expect
that anybody is playing an honest game, the double crosses are never a
surprise.  At least BAD COMPANY manages to be  a post cold war thriller
without demeaning stereotypes of Latin American drug lords.  It's not
about drugs, the new universal threat.  What it is about, well that
unfortunately is never very clear.
     Since the plot is a wash what the film is about, by default, is
style.  There is more tension created by the clash between Laurence
Fishburne's saturated primary-color apartment decor and the unfinished
bomb shelter chic of Langella's corporate office than there is tension
created by any of the characters themselves.  Well-realized sets, a
good pace and some spiffy costumes dress up the goings on.
     Supporting the sets in the film are several performances full of
attitude.  Laurence FIshburne's character doesn't have nearly the depth
of his professor in the still current HIGHER LEARNING, but it is a very
slick performance.  He gives his ex-secret agent man a cool strut and a
tough demeanor.  Ellen Barkin has a BASIC INSTINCT type role, the
heartless femme fatale, a sexual manipulator using her charms to
advance her agenda.  Barkin makes her character seem to be at least
fairly intelligent.  She manages to bring a decent amount of allure to
her stock character, and tries to match Sharon Stone's notorious BASIC
INSTINCT scene.  Frank Langella and Spalding Gray create smarmy amoral
rich characters, complementing their costumes nicely with solid
performances of their routine lines.
     The film, however, ultimately is completely forgettable.  It is
all wrapper and no candy bar.  Strip away the window dressing and the
story is nothing more than a thin excuse to stage a few
well-choreographed gun play scenes and some fairly explicit sex
scenes.  There is no development of any themes, no attempt to raise
political or moral questions.  The film is about absolutely nothing
except sex and gun play.
     Better films of this type include THREE DAYS OF THE CONDOR
(based on the novel SIX DAYS OF THE CONDOR), THE PARALLAX VIEW, THE
MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE and WINTER KILLS.  All four of these manage to
offer some tight suspense and some food for thought as well.

Title
Review for Nostradamus (1994/I)
Starring- Tcheky Kayro, F. Murray Abraham, Amanda Plummer, Rutger Hauer.
Directed by- Roger Christian
Distributed by Orion Classics
     Sometime during the plague of the mid 1500s a doctor named Michel
de Nostradame wrote a few volumes of strange prophetic poems.  Whether
one considers him a gifted seer or a charlatan, he is a character whose
life is brimming with cinematic and narrative possibilities.
     None of those possibilities are realized in the current film
bearing his name.
     The filmmakers wholeheartedly embrace the gifted seer theory of
his life.  They create a laughably inept story out of the few known
facts of his life.  If it wasn't for world-class bad RAPA NUI, this
would be the worst film of the year.
     Almost all the actors somnambulate through their scenes, seemingly
ashamed that somebody in the audience will recognize them.  Tcheky
Kayro, who bears some resemblance to sketches of Nostradamus, gives the
tired cliches of his awkward and unnatural dialogue a shot, but there
is no way to make his lines credible.  His first scene is the dreadful
medical student who knows more than his teacher scene, complete with
dissected cadaver.  Nostradamus contradicts his teacher and recites
near-modern medical theories.  The teacher promptly dies of the plague,
right in the middle of class.  Luckily Nostradamus, the new medical
student, has a theory on curing the plague as well.  Luckily everything
he needs is right at hand.
     The rest of the story continues with the usual mish-mash of narrow
minded witch hunters, dark torture chambers, oppressed would be
scholars, forbidden manuscripts, oppressed modern feminist women, inept
dandy monarchs and a little coveting thy neighbor's wife; all this plus
stock footage of the Second World War.
     The filmmakers take a grave sense of doom to the project.  They
pretend that there is an urgent need for the audience to embrace these
predictions.  They greatly inflate the clarity of Nostradamus's almost
unreadable allegorical poems.  The result is something resembling Sunn
Classics films like IN SEARCH OF HISTORIC JESUS or IN SEARCH OF NOAH'S
ARK.  They credit Nostradamus with everything from predicting the
Kennedy assassination to inventing musk oil perfume and aroma therapy.
     While the cast includes an Oscar winner, the whole production is
amateurish.  The film is exceedingly washed out and grainy, with even
more grainy special effects.  All the sound is noticeably post synched.
The lighting scheme is dark and muddy.  Romanian landmarks are palmed
off as Renaissance France.
     Continuing his near-suicidal career choices since his triumph in
AMADEUS is F. Murray Abraham.  He plays a the leader of some
ill-defined esoteric cult that possesses a hallucinogenic drug
resembling LSD.  Nostradamus takes lots of this, and has nightmarish
visions.  Later, having a flashback no doubt, he imagines himself
surrounded by Nazi soldiers and Panzer tanks.  The soldiers run around
him, but don't seem to see him.
     The manner of his visions is not consistent.  At other times he
just looks in a bowl of water to see stock footage of Hitler, Kennedy,
and others.  To make his prediction of three global wars seem true, the
filmmakers elevate the Gulf War to the standing of World Wars I and
II.  This stock footage technique might be amusing on an I Dream of
Jeannie episode but can hardly pass for special effects in the wake of
JURASSIC PARK.
    Then the filmmakers show that none of them can even count.  They
have character say repeatedly that his visions are for five hundred
years in the future, the end of the twentieth century.  From the mid
16th Century when the film takes place, it is only four hundred
years.
     What Rutger Hauer is doing in this mess is anybody's guess.  His
bizarre role is so small that he at least spares himself from complete
embarrassment.  The only actor to be able to count this as a career
plus is Amanda Plummer.  She manages to squeeze a semblance of
character out of Catherine de Medici.  Her few scenes are a stray
reminder that this could have been a decent historical drama.  One of
Amanda Plummer's scenes is the horror highlight of the film, such as it
is.  It rips off both CARRIE and THE SHINING.  The few horror scenes in
the film are the ones that are most effective.
     If Nostradamus could have looked into the future and seen this
film, he would have burned his books to spare himself this future
indignity.
     For no real reason I saw NOSTRADAMUS and MARY SHELLEY'S
FRANKENSTEIN on the same day.  There are a few similarities between the
two films.  Both are costume dramas concerning medical students and
their unscientific experiments.  Both films had their heroes neglect
their families.  Both had their heroes doggedly pursued across Europe.
Both had a star from AMADEUS.  The complete cinematic poverty of
NOSTRADAMUS made me appreciate the lush gothic excess and outlandish
visual style of the underrated FRANKENSTEIN.

Title
Review for Clerks (1994)
Director: Kevin Smith
Starring: Brian O'Halloran, Jeff Anderson, Marilyn Ghigliotti.
     CLERKS is a bold and audacious comedy from New Jersey.  First-time
director Kevin Smith raised under $30,000 to make this black and white
ode to the minimum wage worker.  A sum that in Hollywood is not enough
to design even an advertising poster.  With that money and a cast of
unknowns he created a sometimes ragged but more often hilarious comedy
of errors.
     Originally the film was rated NC-17 for language alone.  A famous
lawyer made a freedom of speech argument and got it reduced to an R
without cutting.  CLERKS takes the obscene adolescent banter of the
aimless class and raises it to a new level.  The film charts the course
of one misbegotten day in the life of a convenience store clerk and a
video store clerk, neither of whom seem concerned with actually
working..  Most of the humor in the film is very crude, discussions
over sex and former girlfriends, descriptions of X-rated tapes.  But
the film is not just a barrage of crude jokes, if it were that the film
would be little more than a fast food version of POLICE ACADEMY.
Beneath the graphic dialogue are serious issues of relationships and
goals.  As things go progressively wrong, the clerks are forced to face
up to the shortcomings of their personalities.  Through an absurd
series of unlikely events they have to make choices that will effect
the rest of their lives.  Beneath all the crude banter, there is a
complex discussion of the two divergent philosophies of the clerks.
The variety of people who manage to wander into the stores keeps the
film being a monotonous two-character dialogue.  Odd (to say the least)
circumstances take the clerks out of the mall briefly to provide a
break from the one-set atmosphere.
     While the black and white film and realistic locations suggest a
documentary, the events quickly suggest surrealism.  Like Luis Bunuel's
great farces on the manners of the European upper classes,  CLERKS
takes a cross section of lower class people and faces them with the
sublimely ridiculous.  Dante, the main character, is plunged into a
world that seems to be plotting against him, and everyone he has ever
known or wanted to know.  Dante thought he had trouble when his relief
fails to show up so he can play hockey.  When he reads in the newspaper
that his girlfriend is getting married to somebody she never mentioned,
his troubles just begin.
      The shoestring budget and non-professional actors leads to a less
than perfect film.  In one long scene, shot with one camera movement,
one of the actors noticeably forgets her line.  Other actors give
somewhat stiff deliveries to their small bits.  The flaws really add a
dimension to the film.  They remind you that this is not a polished
multi-million dollar film where a team of 32 writers managed to come up
with nothing worth watching.  This film is a joke scribbled on the wall
as the pen runs out of ink.  The crudeness of the technique accents the
crudeness of the humor.

Title
Review for Congo (1995)
     After the success of JURASSIC PARK, Michael Crichton's name has
become an industry.  Anything with his name on it has been rushed into
production to cash in the coat tails of his dinosaurs.  In many ways,
CONGO is JURASSIC PARK without the killer reptiles.  Next to the
stunning prehistoric beasts, the killer apes of CONGO are merely just
impressive.
     If you look at CONGO on its own terms, instead of as a limp
pseudo-sequel to the most successful film of all time, CONGO is a good
old-fashioned action/ adventure film.  Director Frank Marshall manages
to recapture feel of old serials, and integrates this completely with
the modern look of the high-tech story.
     What really holds this film together are the performances of two
under-rated stars.  Ernie Hudson plays the guide.  He describes himself
as a great white hunter, who just happens to be black.  He does his
whole role as a cross between Errol Flynn and David Niven.  His black
"white" hunter allows him to address some of the racism inherent in the
African adventure genre.  He points to the falsity of Hollywood
stereotypes several times.  The other characterization holding the film
together is Tim Curry as a supposed Romanian philanthropist.  Curry
evokes the untrustworthy nobility of Bela Lugosi.  Why the other
characters allow him to tag along on the expedition, when it is clear
that is up to no good, is one of the unexplained mysteries of the
screenplay.  If they had kicked him out, however, the film would have
suffered greatly.  Hudson and Curry make this otherwise bland
expedition exiting to listen to when the action is at a lull.
     The science of the story is stripped down to a minimum.  Little of
the high tech nonsense is explained.  Part of it involves a talking
ape, some of the rest the search for the perfect industrial diamond.
Instead of bogging down in explanations of those elements, the
mismatched expedition moves from crisis to crisis quickly.
     CONGO is a series of political and natural disasters that get in
the way of the group and their uncommon goals.  What makes it a cut
above some other recent action films is a raft of good minor characters
and some very droll dialogue in John Patrick Shanley's fast paced
script.  Director Frank Marshall has been a long time associate of
Stephen Spielberg, producing such films as RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK.  He
directs much of the film in Spielberg's style, but thankfully tones
down some of the childish schmaltz that has hindered many of
Spielberg's recent adventure films.
     Every film involving apes has to top the animal effects used in
the last great ape film.  Stan Winston does that here easily.
Considering how many people are credited with designing and working the
apes, that is not surprising.  A few of the ILM special effects in the
last part of the film have a slightly cheesy look, but in a way that
helps to remind one of the classic 1930s African adventure films and
serials that CONGO tries to emulate.
     No doubt many people will find fault with the depiction of Africa
as the land of lost tribes and corrupt governments.  Others will fault
the depiction of apes as carnivorous monsters.  CONGO at least makes an
effort to deflate some of the stereotypes and false notions that are
inherent in its genre.

Title
Review for Pulp Fiction (1994)
Dir: Quentin Tarentino
Starring: John Travolta, Samuel L. Jackson, Uma Thurman,
          Christopher Walken, Tim Roth, Eric Stoltz, Amanda Plummer,
          Roseanne Arquette, Harvey Keitel and Bruce Willis.
Screenplay: Quentin Tarentino and Roger Avery
Executive Producers include Danny DeVito
     There is an axiom that directors who have a big hit with their
debut have a big bomb with their second film.  From Orson Welles to
Spike Lee and John Singleton, this has held true.  Quentin Tarentino,
who came out of nowhere to write and direct RESERVOIR DOGS has broken
that rule with PULP FICTION.  It shows no signs of being the work of a
young man struggling with too many ideas.  Instead it is the polished
work of an accomplished film maker.
     As the title suggests, the film is about the world of gangsters
and gamblers that populated the cheap paperback fiction of the
thirties, forties and fifties, updated to a somewhat nebulous modern
time.  Just as SHORT CUTS interweaved various highbrow story threads
into one somewhat convoluted and far reaching story, PULP FICTION
takes themes from Cornell Woolrich and Raymond Chandler, mixes them
with Seventies' TV and Fifties' movies into intertwining stories of
deals gone wrong and criminals searching for some bigger meaning to it
all.
     Surprisingly enough, John Travolta, considered by many to be a
has-been, or a one-hit wonder turns in the performance of his career.
As the hapless hitman who figures into all the story threads he holds
the film together.  Between jobs he rattles on constantly to his
cohort Samuel L. Jackson about the glories of life in Amsterdam and
eroticism of foot massages.  Jackson tends more towards quoting TV
shows and Blaxploitaion movies.  Travolta and Jackson encounter the
rest of the all star cast, most of whom really just have glorified
cameos in their own little story segments.
     The various story segments each reflect different elements of pulp
fiction genres- fixed fights, double crossed deals, dance contests,
narcotics, weird perversions, and mob hits.  Each story is really an
homage to a famous crime film, THE KILLERS , THE SET-UP and KISS ME
DEADLY, to name just a couple.  Even samurai films get a slight nod.
The stories quickly swings from surreal to absurd to profound, and no
story is  without its share of media savvy humor.  Almost all the
characters seem obsessed with the media.  Hitman Travolta points out
the difference between a Marilyn Monroe look alike and a Mamie van
Doren look alike.  Jackson quotes the "Kung Fu" series.
     Tarantino's ear for dialogue and eye for sight gags is priceless.
The little throw away lines and obtuse arguments that the characters
constantly get into are what make this sometimes ultra-violent film
worthwhile.  Just when you peg a scene as being routine, some odd comic
mishap sends the plot off in another direction.  Tarentino also uses an
odd non-linear narrative structure that leaves some important
unanswered questions, and then fills in the gaps by returning to some
plot threads, sort of like Kubrik's structure in THE KILLING, but not
quite as rigorous.  This structure works by keeping the pace steady and
building some suspense.
     While the film is, at close to two and a half hours, never boring
and a great success, it has a few minor faults.  A bizarre S& M scene
doesn't really match the offhandedly flip tone of the rest of the
film.  Another is that some of the highly hyped actors in the film have
little more than a cameo.  Uma Thurman is really just in two scenes,
Harvey Keitel in one, and Chris Walken has just a few lines.  And while
Tarentino scores big as both writer and director, he scores much less
an actor.  With actors of the caliber of Chris Walken doing bits,
Tarentino just doesn't hold up in his acting scene.
     Those minor quibbles aside,  it is easy to see why PULP FICTION
won the Palm d'or at Cannes.  It delivers on the potential that the
low-budget RESERVOIR DOGS promised.

Title
Review for I Like It Like That (1994)
Director: Darnell Martin
Starring: Lauren Velez, Jon Seda, Rita Moreno, Griffin Dunne
     Darnell Martin complained that the distribution company was
marketing her film based on the fact that she is a minority woman.  She
felt it implied the film otherwise wasn't very good, and needed special
consideration.  The film is good, however; quite good.  Part of what
makes it original is the fact that a minority woman is the lead
character.  Even in the new wave of minority written and produced
films, women are often relegated into demeaning stereotypical roles.
Lauren Velez,who plays the central character in this film, breaks out
of these stereotypes.  She is average looking and intelligent, unlike
the bubble-headed beauty queens that generally populate films.  It is
the men in her Bronx, New York neighborhood that become cartoonish
stereotypes.  Her husband, played by Job Seda,  is more concerned with
the perception of his machismo than providing for his family.  His
friends are an affably misguided group of ne'er-do-wells.
     The plot walks a fine line between reality and satire.  Elements
like a transvestite brother saving money for a sex change, a
hot-to-trot neighbor, and a WASP salsa record promoter (Griffin Dunne)
could have been easily lampooned.  Director Darnell Martin chose the
hard road and treats all the characters with respect.  This makes the
problems that the lead character faces, like getting enough money to
keep her family off of welfare, real problems.  The events leading up
to her financial situation have a funny side to them, but after the few
jokes, the situation remains.  It is here that Darnell Martin makes her
statements.  The male characters are willing enough to be around for
the good time, but unwilling to deal with the aftermath.  Unclaimed or
unsupervised children abound in the film, with women characters begging
the fathers to own up to their responsibility.  Men want women for show
at parties, but have to be blackmailed into letting them actually use
their mental talents on a daily basis.
      If the film broke down into the men being buffoons and the women
being abused saints, it would be easy to dismiss the film as a
diatribe.  Fortunately, some of the female characters are willing
enough to make fools of themselves.  Oscar winner (for WEST SIDE
STORY) Rita Moreno paints an unflattering comic portrait of the
intrusive mother-in-law.  She dislikes Velez because she has some
African heritage, while all of her son's side of the family is "pure
Castillian".  The one character that makes the most sense is the
transvestite.
     This film is another low budget wonder.  It manages to be part
Cinderella story, while still letting people solve their own problems.
A lot of films recently have shown the exteriors of lower income urban
neighborhoods, only to show lavish sound stage interiors inhabited by
rich drug lords. I LIKE IT LIKE THAT takes you inside to see how real
people live.

Title
Review for Quiz Show (1994)
     Robert Redford has proven that he is a better middle-aged director
than he is a middle-aged actor.  His recent roles in HAVANA, SNEAKERS,
and the truly dreadful INDECENT PROPOSAL can in no way stand beside his
stunning achievement in directing A RIVER RUNS THROUGH IT and now QUIZ
SHOW.
     The ambiance of the late Eisenhower years is perfectly
recreated.  The cars, clothing, hair styles, magazine covers, and idiom
all come together to make a credible world, a world where naive people
believed that everything they saw on television was true.  It was
television that made everyone equal, and into this world come people
from diverse backgrounds.  All of them see the new medium as their
ticket to the top.  Television becomes something like a mirror that
reflects the character's moral make-up.
     When a film is based on questions of character, what a good
director needs most is character actors.  Quiz show is filled them.  John
Turturro (DO THE RIGHT THING) is mercilessly annoying in the role of
Queens, New York bookworm Herbert Stempel, a man whom one person
comments has a face for radio.  Few actors would have dared to create a
nudge with so few redeeming qualities.  Diametrically opposed to him is
Ralph Fiennes (SCHINDLER'S LIST) as Charles van Doren, the handsome
college professor and son of a prominent intellectual family.  He is as
flawless as Stempel is flawed.  Between the two of them there is variety
of fights: rich v. poor, Gentile v. Jew, handsome v. unhandsome,
suburbs v. city.
     While they are not top billed, the amoral center of the film is
the two game show producers, played by Hank Azaria and David Paymer.
They are two fast talkers who take basically honest people, and tell
them how the game show really works.  David Paymer as Dan Enright,
carries the heaviest load in the film.  If his depiction of the producer
who sees nothing more than ratings had been off the mark, the whole
film would have faltered badly.  But David Paymer is every media
executive.  If he doesn't win the Oscar for best supporting actor, it is
probably because the show is fixed.
     The only near miss is Rob Morrow, whose attempt at a Kennedy-esque
Boston accent manages to mostly be grating.  Also appearing in the film
is Martin Scorcese in a cameo.  One cannot help speculating that he gave
Redford a few tips on camera angles.
     The script by Paul Attanasio lets up on the moralizing enough for
a few good laughs.  Robert Redford keeps the longish film moving at a
good pace, leaving one story line for another just before it gets
boring.  QUIZ SHOW kicks off the serious fall Oscar race, and should
be a strong contender in most categories including minor ones like
costume and set design.
     This film would make a good double feature with Francis Coppola's
similarly themed TUCKER: THE MAN AND HIS DREAM.  Both are about the
gap between idealism and reality in the post World War II era.

Title
Review for Exit to Eden (1994)
Director: Garry Marshall
Starring: Dana Delaney, Paul Mercurio, Rosie O'Donnell, Dan Aykroyd
Based on the novel by Anne Rice
     Garry Marshall, who made a Cinderella story out of street
prostitution (PRETTY WOMAN), was the obvious choice to convert Anne
Rice's lurid S&M novel into a routine Hollywood comedy.  His result
with this material is not as good.  Watching EXIT TO EDEN reminded me
of switching between two movies, one a near remake of the Aykroyd
comedy DRAGNET and the other an edited "erotic" film on USA Network's
Up All Night.  I had the feeling that when I switched from one film to
the other I missed whatever good parts there might be.  Both as a
comedy and as an erotic film, EXIT TO EDEN is a failure.
     Rosie O'Donnell and Dan Aykroyd play cops sent to a selective
sexual fantasy resort.  Aykroyd is, of course, a straight-laced prude.
O'Donnell is at first portrayed as streetwise.  Disappointingly, once
on the island she is also a straight-laced prude.  All of their funny
scenes are in the advertisements.  This, mathematically speaking,
leaves over an hour and a half of failed jokes and missed
opportunities.  Early in the film police partners O'Donnell and Aykroyd
make a good comedy team.  For reasons that are never clear, Aykroyd and
O'Donnell are split up on the island.  This leaves them both flailing
around looking for laughs in all the wrong places.  Or in Aykroyd's
case, just mostly looking lost.
     The S&M erotic plotline involves Dana Delaney and BALLROOM
DANCING's Paul Mercurio.  The concept of S&M has been heavily sanitized
for the film.  The slaves perform chores around the island, and if they
are lucky, get ordered to kiss Delaney's foot.  The limp whipping that
a few receive wouldn't make a cat hiss.  There are a few campy moments
of Dana Delaney being carried around by her slaves, but not enough to
make this a camp classic.  The few nude scenes of Mercurio and Delaney,
considering the subject matter, come off as very tame.  Most of the
time Delaney is depicted giving lessons to middle aged house wives on
how to spice up their sex lives.  These lessons are played for comedy,
but wind up, like the whole film, being neither funny nor erotic.  One
lesson has Delaney lead the housewives in how to talk dirty.  An older
woman says, "Put your thing in my thing."  Unfortunately, that is one of
the funnier jokes in the film.
     The most annoying thing about the film is that O'Donnell and
Aykroyd are sent to the island to recover a small object.  All they
have to do is ask for it.  They never do.  I suppose if they simply
asked for it, then the film would have been over in five minutes.  In
retrospect that would have been better for everyone involved.
     Several years ago Gerard Depardieu had much better luck in Barbet
Shroeder's S&M comedy MAITRESSE.  People interested in the subject
matter would do better to seek out that on video.  The STORY OF O was
also filmed by the people that brought you EMMANUELLE, and is at least
better than EXIT TO EDEN, but not much.

Title
Review for Rob Roy (1995)
Directed by Michael Caton-Jones
Starring: Liam Neeson, Jessica Lange, John Hurt, Tim Roth, Eric Stoltz
Screenplay by Alan Sharp
     Sometime in the last few decades screen villains became sympathetic
figures.  Even Darth Vader eventually had a sad story to explain how he
was driven to become evil.  ROB ROY is not one of those revisionist
films.  The villains in ROB ROY are simply evil people.  The only good
thing you can say about them is that their costumes are nice.  Sure, the
film is really about Rob Roy MacGregor, a Scottish folk hero, but the
villains make the film worth seeing.
     John Hurt was born to play this kind of role.  He is an unpopular
English born nobleman, the Marquis of Montrose.  He talks in
pseudo-Shakespearean double entendres.  He is just plain evil.  His young
ward, Archibald Cunningham (Tim Roth), however, goes beyond plain evil.
Every dimension of his being is evil.  He proclaims himself to be a noble
bastard and proves this in every scene he is in.  The real threat that
these two pose goes beyond class conflict and 18th century politics.
Montrose and Cunningham are both spineless coxcombs.  They wear wigs,
make-up, and embroidered clothing.  They  make exaggerated courtly
gestures with lace handkerchiefs.  Their threat isn't to Rob Roy
specifically, but an affront to the hard working agricultural lifestyle
in general.  To make matters worse, Archibald Cunningham is an unbeatable
swordsman.
     In stark contrast to these characters are Robert Roy  MacGregor and
his followers.  They are the Highlanders of Scotland.  Extended families
live close to the land raising cattle.  Among them, a man's word is his
bond.  Rob Roy (Liam Neeson) seems to be an overgrown boy scout expecting
all men to be men of honor.  He is head of his clan, but listens
democratically to his kinfolk and tries to guide them with compassionate
wisdom.  His wife Mary (Jessica Lange) considers him to be proud and
stubborn, but together they share an idyllic love that can only be found
crowd pleasing romantic action films.  Rob Roy is as good and honorable
as his opponents are deceitful.  Few films have such black and white
characters since the classic ADVENTURES OF ROBIN HOOD with Errol Flynn.
     These two world views, the unquestionably rugged one of Rob Roy and
the decidedly foppish one of the Marquis of Montrose quickly come into
conflict.  The plot is a pretty dusty one- a variation on the westerns
like SHANE and ONCE UPON A TIME IN THE WEST.  Evil people conspire to run
honest hard working folks off their land.  Transporting this plot from
the western plains to the Scottish Highlands makes it easy to forget
that you've really seen it all before.  The good guys wear kilts instead
of white hats.  Sword fights replace gunfights.
     Action and romance are emphasized at the expense of history.  A few
terms like "Jacobite" get thrown around.  The film never really explains
what this is, but when it is clear that Rob Roy is one and the Marquis
of Montrose isn't, one can guess that being a Jacobite is a good thing.
The film spends no more time on it.  ROB ROY is not meant to be an
informative historical drama.
       The three lead male characters bear the brunt of the action.  The
romance belongs solidly to Jessica Lange.  She brings a fresh quality to
her role.  Most often the lead actress is way too glamorous for her rural
surroundings, the peasant woman in designer gowns.  Jessica Lange brings
a realistic earthy quality to her character.  Her clothing looks
homemade, and her red hair blows wild in the wind.  Even more strikingly,
she is a female film character with more common sense than many of the
headstrong men around her.  Typical of the role of women in legends, her
efforts are towards peace and settlement, while the male characters
strive toward conflict.
     As a populist crowd pleaser, ROB ROY is a classic film.  It is easy
to root for a hero that tries to fight fair against corrupt government
officials, and easy to boo at the vainly shallow Archibald Cunningham.
The film has no surprises, but it does have some well-staged action
scenes, edge of the seat suspense, sharp dialogue and striking Scottish
locations.

Title
Review for Rapa Nui (1994)
     The premise for RAPA NUI is a promising one.  Easter Island (known
to the natives as Rapa Nui) is a microcosm society on the verge of
apocalypse.  The last of their forest is in peril of being cut down.
Overpopulation means more work for less food.  The failure of the local
gods to provide has forced a religious crisis.  But the premise put
forth in the tightly edited and lushly scenic trailer is not what
Costner's Tig Productions delivered.  What is on the screen is instead
ROCKY in a hula skirt, or KARATE KID goes coconuts.  It is a big
sporting event competition film.  The sport in this case is,
appropriately enough, an Easter egg hunt.
     The first sign of trouble is the first scene.  The local chief,
called "Birdman" points to a rotting corpse and bemoans the fact that
he has nobody to swim for his clan's team in this year's event.  The
painful and painfully slow machinations around the egg hunt swim fill
up much of the multi-pronged plot.  The rest concerns a group of
neo-Marxist stone cutters called the "Short Ears."  The utterly
simplistic class conflict between the "Long Ears" (the haves) and the
"Short Ears" (the have-nots) takes the place of any development of
threads of religion, culture, ethnography, or tribal ritual.
     Not much is known of true Rapa Nuian practices, but instead of an
informative film based on similar cultures, writer director Reynolds
(with the assistance of co-writer Tim Rose Price) make the worst paint
by numbers coloring book level fable.  Esai Morales, a fine Hispanic
actor (BAD BOYS) is totally miscast as the Marxist-atheist rabble
rouser who spouts on about religion being the distractor of the masses
as if a premature copy of "The Communist Manifesto" had washed up on
the beach.  Other dialogue ranges from incredibly modern, to
stultifying inane.  Birdman extols at one point to his Basil
Rathbone-esque aide "I don't have time for this now, Priest.  I have
entrails to read." Birdman then stands by while the lowly Short Ears
confront him with their list of labor disputes, which is then repeated
endlessly throughout the film in case anybody missed that it was plot
development time.
     Another major disappointment is the quick way in which the carving
of the stone monoliths is glossed over.  People seem busy, but we never
really see how they are carved.  Instead, the scene plays like bad out
takes from the pyramid scene in THE TEN COMMANDMENTS.  All of the epic
crowd scenes all resemble a bunch of disoriented people being told by
somebody off-camera to "now look busy."
     While I am cataloging the failures in this dismal failure of a
film, let me also add that the love story, the one element you can
always count on in a South Sea Island film, is also mishandles
completely, with the third-billed Sandrine Holt hardly being in the
film at all.  Her story, is the most ludicrous.
     I had read complaints about the cross racial casting and was
willing to dismiss them as another case a PCism, but the casting of
American accented leads and Aussie accented minor characters, with
whites in heavy make-up as extras, blew away any remaining sense of
credibility this well intentioned misfire might have had.
     Kevin Costner produced but does not appear in this New Agey tale
of native life.  During the requisite Island Festival scene I thought a
better title for this farango might have been DANCES WITHOUT WOLVES.
     On a serious note, people interested in the topic of Pacific
island life would do better to rent F. W. Murnau's TABU or trying to
seek out John Ford's impressive THE HURRICANE.  Other hard to find gems
include WHITE SHADOWS IN THE SOUTH SEAS and THE PAGAN, both directed by
W. S. van Dyke.  A little further East and into Thailand, CHANG from
the directors of King (Cooper and Shoedsack), still ranks as one of the
finest ethnographic films ever made.

Title
Review for Specialist, The (1994)
     Once upon a time Warner Bros. churned out B gangster movies at an
incredible rate.  Some of these were punishment films.  A popular star
would get the notion he or she could refuse scripts or ask for more
pay, and he or she would be forced to star in a B film.  This told them
who was boss, the studio.  They would work with a group of standard
Warner contract actors and studio hack technicians on some left over
sets.  Cut in some  stock footage and in a few weeks the studio had a
violent genre piece, based on some trash novel the studio bought at
bargain prices.
     It is fitting that Warner Bros should be behind this overwrought
action misfire.  It plays like a punishment picture.  The dialogue is so
corny and the plot so transparent, that you can hardly believe A-list
stars are in it.  Character development is like examples from a
how-to-write-good book.  Sly Stallone is sensitive, show him adopting a
stray cat.  Sly Stallone is un hombre mas macho.  Show him throwing a
radio-weilding punk out of a bus window.  Show him flex for no real
reason.  Sharon Stone is a femme fatale bent on revenge.  Give her blue
tinted flashbacks, over and over again.  Give her peek-a-boo costumes
and let her walk into exclusive parties without an invitation.  Give her
double entendre dialogue about the heat from Sly's controlled
explosions.  Hype her nude scene all over TV and magazines for months.
That and the explosions are really all the film is about.
     The supporting B-film cast is on firmer ground doing what they do
best, trying to breathe some sense of life into ridiculous dialogue and
ponderous scenes.  They try but lose an uphill battle.  The big book on
how to make bad films highly recommends casting people to play the most
distant ethnic group from their real one.  Rod Steiger is a master at
this.  He discovered long ago that when cast to play a Latin American,
all one needs to do is say words like "djoo" and "leesen" for "you" and
"listen."  Add to that the crowning touch of always fidgeting with a
gold crucifix, and there you have it, aging Latin American drug lord..
James Woods manages to be a creepy ex-CIA guy very well.  That is his
bread and butter role.  He is given such ridiculous scenes, such as
having a breakdown yelling at a tape recorder, that one ponders why he
isn't simply committed by his friends for the safety of all.  Eric
Roberts plays a creepy character as well.  He is remarkably good at it.
So good that it is, well, creepy.
     The title refers to Sly Stallone's character being an explosives
expert.  This is the biggest fumble of the film.  He has a talent for
"focused explosions."  Somehow he can set off a big wad of plastic
explosive in a busy night club and kill only the one person in a room
that he targets.  He hangs around to watch his success. (1) How does the
bomb know not to send debris into innocent people? (2) If he's going to
hang around, why not just shoot the one guy with a sniper rifle? How he
manages to set up some of the more elaborate "controlled" explosions is
never made clear.  A major plot point involving an explosion victim is
also never explained, leaving one of the biggest plot holes in recent
film memory.  It does provide James Woods with one stray truly funny
scene.
     The stars' clothed and unclothed bodies (Rod Steiger excepted)
provide something pleasant to look at, and Miami provides some nice
scenery.  If you demand more than this from a film, then THE
SPECIALIST is not for you.  It is at times so overdetermined an example
of macho film making that it might qualify as a guilty pleasure, but a
very guilty one indeed.

Title
Review for Blue Sky (1994)
Dir: Tony Richardson
Starring: Tommy Lee Jones, Jessica Lange, Powers Booth, Carrie Snodgrass
     After sitting on the shelf for several years due to Orion's
financial difficulties, British director Tony Richardson's final film
has gotten released.  Richardson was once one of the "angry young men"
of British cinema.  His work includes LOOK BACK IN ANGER, THE LOVED ONE,
TOM JONES, and the occasional Hollywood project like THE BORDER.
     Richardson always tried to find the human element to his stories,
tried to tell compassionate tales of middle-class struggle.  When the ad
campaign for BLUE SKY described a "Manchurian-Candidate" type
conspiracy film, I thought that Richardson was a poor choice for such a
story.  Again, though, it is a case of a distributor trying to mislead
the audience.  BLUE SKY is not a paranoid cold war conspiracy film.
There is a minor subplot near the end that has been edited into a neat
ad campaign, but the film is really about a dysfunctional military
family trying to get things together.
     Once you stop waiting for the conspiracy to turn up, the film is
quite enjoyable for what it is.  It has flaws to be sure.  The concept of
a dysfunctional military family is fairly much of a film cliche, but
Richardson manages to show some things that have not been seen before,
and make the characters at least seem human.
     Tommy Lee Jones is a military nuclear scientist, whose less than
right wing stance has hindered his career, and Jessica Lange is his
movie star wanna-be wife, whose open exhibitionism has also caused its
share of scandals.  Lange gets a chance to develop a full blooded
character, a woman who seems so full of anger at her lost dreams that
she is bent on self destruction.  Jones, in relatively laid back
performance, juggles his waning career and two adolescent daughters as
he tries to also deal with his marriage and the Atomic Energy
Commission.  It is out of this last element that the conspiracy ad
campaign has been cobbled.  Forget that angle.  As a conspiracy film,
BLUE SKY is second-rate.  As a family drama, BLUE SKY scores much
better, with some fresh scenes and excellent performances.
     Cris O'Donnell, the student from SCENT OF A WOMAN plays Power
Boothe's son.  BLUE SKY was filmed before, and he appears younger than
in his previous role.  The inevitable teenage love story has some sweet
and one explosively funny scene.
       If conspiracy films are your bag, rent Abel Ferrara's
BODYSNATCHERS, Alan J. Pakula's PARALLAX VIEW, or Sydney Pollack's
THREE DAYS OF THE CONDOR.  They deliver what the ads for this film
promise.  If you like good actors in a decent enough drama, give BLUE
SKY a shot.

Title
Review for Colonel Chabert, Le (1994)
     While the free-wheeling spirit of the French New Wave may be all
but gone, except for a few festival circuit oddities, the tide of
high-brow revisionist costume dramas keeps getting stronger.  Following
close on the heels of QUEEN MARGOT, a  Dumas novel adaptation, comes
COLONEL CHARBET.  This latest film is adapted with remarkable subtlety
from a novel by Honore de Balzac.  Balzac is one of those authors that
one always means to read sometime, but never quite gets the book all
the way from the shelf to the cashier's counter.  This impressive film
might change that.  It is one of those films that makes you want to
read the book to find out more of the elusive details of the strange
story.
     COLONEL CHARBET is somewhat of a similar story to THE RETURN OF
MARTIN GUERRE.  A soldier, after a long time, returns home to find his
wife remarried, and his money, well, tied up.  The setting for the
story this time is the Empire period,  1817 to be exact.  The Colonel
is played by MARTIN GUERRE'S Depardieu.  Early in the film, Gerard
Depardieu has a long monologue.  He explains his situation to a busy
lawyer.  Eventually they trade stories on the depths to which they have
seen humanity sink.  The story calls for flashbacks but few are given,
brief glinpses of a long ago battle.  Depardieu manages to hold our
interest merely by talking in a static shot.  His low-key, seemingly
effortless approach to the complex character of Colonel Charbet is one
of the things that sells the film.
     With all the expensive trappings and elaborate Empire era
costumes the film runs the risk of becoming a bloated Masterpiece
Theatre episode.  The screenplay downplays the pageantry and even the
battle scenes.  Universal themes of ambition, greed, happiness and
justice come the forefront.  Without being cardboard cutouts, various
characters come to stand for certain ideals; the lawyer being
interested in justice most obviously.  It is small moments, little
gestures and expressions that make them real.  The way the lawyer reads
his mail while listening, Countess Ferraud's (Fanny Ardant) ploy with
her necklace, Colonel Charbet's expression when he looks at his wife's
fraudulent tax statements, all of these things make the dusty literary
characters into real people.  Injecting otherwise dusty storylines with
a note of realism is one of the Balzac is noted for.  Director Yves
Angelo, along with additional screenwriters, managed to capture that
sense of realism.  Too often the subtle elements of a costume drama are
lost in the translation.
     In terms of visual style, realism abounds as well.  The candle-lit
night scenes are dim and yellowed.  The streets seem to be always
recovering from a recent mudstorm.  The handsome, and for women often
bizarre, costumes don't look like permanent press polyester.  The
household servants look like the underfed and poorly educated people
that they probably would have been.  The hard edged Colonel Charbet,
(Depardieu), looks awkward and uncomfortable the few times that he has
to wear his dandyish suit.  His lawyer on the other hand looks as if he
was born to inhabit such flamboyant attire.  The Countess, (Ardant) has
an elaborate array of  Empire era hair accessories and doo-dads in her
room, she at least seems to know where they all go and what they are
used for.
     Ardant has a difficult role in the Countess.  She is both a victim
of circumstance and a victimizer.  Her role could easily fall into
another spider-woman portrayal of the greedy and cold blooded woman so
often found in period literature.  Ardant manages to keep the Countess
a sympathetic figure, even as she tries to use her children as pawns
and tries to deceive her husband, Count Ferraud (Andre Dussollier).
     There is a lot of history  in the film, but it is a fairly
painless lesson in post-Napoleonic events.  COLONEL CHARBET is an
easily enjoyable and easily understandable film.  The writing, acting,
directing and production design is all first rate for a period costume
drama.

Title
Review for Color of Night (1994)
     COLOR OF NIGHT is yet another derivative serial killer film.  If
you have seen PSYCHO, THE HEARSE, and TOOL BOX MURDERS there is
absolutely nothing new here.  What is unusual is the fact that a truly
fine cast including Bruce Willis, Ruben Blades, Brad Dourif, and Lesley
Anne Warren are trapped trying their best to breath life into the
stillborn double entendres and tired plot cliches of the hackneyed
"mystery." Even action star Lance Henriksen is left with nothing to do
but talk in the endless and very unconvincing group therapy sessions
that make up the bulk of the film.  Willis, as the psychologist, does
the same happy-go-lucky smart aleck tough guy turn he has become famous
for.  The problem is that a psychologist should be sensitive and
understanding, at least professionally.  Blades, Dourif, Warren, and
Henriksen are thinly written cardboard characters.  Blades, who in real
life has a degree from Harvard, does another hot tempered, dim witted
Chicano stereotype.  Dourif, who is awesome in Wise Blood, plays a
obsessive neurotic who keeps counting everything throughout the film.
Some of this is supposed to be funny, but seeing a decent actor in
truly bad make-up given so little to make a character from is merely
sad.
    The only actor who can count this film as a career plus is Jane
March, whose last film was The Lover.  Her character has some depth and
she really does shine on the screen.  The few scenes of her with Willis
are the only ones in the film worth watching, although she is in
relatively little of the film as a character named Rose.
    Much of the plot, however relies on a transparent gimmick that is
poorly executed.  The obviousness of this gimmick destroys any sense of
mystery early on.  One simply waits for the characters on screen to
notice what is painfully apparent.
    Disney, who owns the company that released this film, has cut the
film to an R rating.  No amount of additional scenes, however, could
make COLOR OF NIGHT into a good film.

Title
Review for Higher Learning (1995)
Written and directed by John Singleton
Starring: Jennifer Connelly, Ice Cube, Omar Epps, Kristy Swanson,
          Laurence Fishburne
Title sequence by Elaine and Saul Bass
     Everyone in HIGHER LEARNING has the same first name.  It's "The."
There's The Athlete, The Black Activist, The Stern Professor, The
Lesbian Feminist,  The Skinhead and The Clueless  Blonde.  Except the
professor, everybody belongs to organized campus groups.  The
advertisement for the film points to the main problem with the film.
There is a totem pole like object with the actor's faces superimposed
onto icons- a swastika, a black power fist,  a double-female lesbian
symbol plus others..  This is topped by a gun.  The actors are not
people but walking sets of values.  The gun alerts us that the values
will be in conflict.
     One of the best things about the film is Saul (PSYCHO) Bass's
pulsating title sequence set to Shaft-like music.  The energy rapidly
dissipates when the film cuts to a too obviously staged pep rally.  You
can imagine an assistant director off screen yelling,"OK now, everybody
chant in unison."  An obviously set-up quality plagues much of the
film, both visually and narratively.  The prop statue of Columbus at
the fictitious Columbus University oddly kept reminding me of the
"Knowledge is Good" sign in ANIMAL HOUSE.
     HIGHER LEARNING does get going eventually.  A protracted series of
small conflicts over music and roommate manners leads to more
substantive issues.  Once the characters are established, several of
them do become interesting, if not entirely credible.John Singleton did
give an amount of depth to his iconic characters.  They do more than
just espouse their party lines.  Even one of the neo-Nazi skinheads
shows some evidence of having thought through the things he believes
in.  When characters discuss similar topics among their own groups, the
lack of common ground among these ideologies becomes clear.
     Kristy Swanson (BUFFY THE VAMPIRE SLAYER) is in a group called
something like Students for a Non-Sexist Society.  Men are not allowed
to join.  When a man asks if that isn't sexist, he is treated as if he
is dense to suggest that.  Obviously it is a women's issue and a
women's group.  Singleton has his actors underplay the scene.  It
becomes a casual boy-meets-girl scene, more sweet than pointed.  Groups
that state their purpose as unity but only let a narrow group join do
abound on college campuses.
     Best among the ensemble cast is Laurence (DEEP COVER) Fishburne.
The character of the highly educated and Jamaican accented political
science teacher is a big departure from his typical cop and hoodlum
roles.  Through many years of teaching, he has seen it all and heard it
all.  I suspect that billing for the film was alphabetical since top
billed Jennifer Connelly (CREEPERS) was only a few scenes.  The film
stereotype for feminists is often an angry bitter woman with a bad
haircut.  Connelly gives us something quite different.  She is a gentle
and supportive character, relaxed with her friends and at peace with
the world.  Of all the students, she is the one that comes off most as
real person.  In a larger role, Ice Cube (BOYZ N THE HOOD) shows a
talent for both comedy and drama.  Unfortunately he is surrounded by a
less interesting collection of followers, and has one too many
confrontations with the racist University Police.
     Much of the story development is too obvious.  When a character
gets a leaflet warning about a crime problem on campus, that person
becomes a victim of that crime the very next day.  The Black activists
and the neo-Nazis are on an obvious collision course.  Singleton tries
to create a SHORT CUTS like world where people's offhand actions affect
others in unforeseen and unknown ways, but the world is too tightly
connected.  Out of 33.000 students, the core group of a dozen
characters has way too much effect on eachother.  HIGHER LEARNING
should have been another DO THE RIGHT THING, but it winds up as a
warmed over SCHOOL DAZE.  Still, with more and more Hollywood films
about absolutely nothing, credit should be given to John Singleton for
making a film about relevant ideas in our society.  Several excellent
performances and some thought provoking writing make the film worth
seeing.
     I would like to recommend a somewhat better and quite overlooked
film that examines the forces in society by juggling a microcosm of
people,  John Sayles' CITY OF HOPE.

Title
Review for Reine Margot, La (1994)
Directed by Patrice Chereau
Starring- Isabelle Adjani, Jean-Hugues Anglade, Virna Lisi,
     For those of you who thought "I, Claudius" lacked intrigue or
Polanski's MACBETH was weak on the swordplay, there is QUEEN MARGOT.
Following the decade long trend of big-budget costume dramas from
France that began with DANTON and has escalated upward, comes this
lavish historical drama with something for everyone, and perhaps too
much for some.
     A special English-language introductory text tries to explain the
political situation of 1570s France, and a chart of the succession to
the throne placed in the theatre lobby help somewhat in deciphering the
convoluted story. Early on it becomes clear that it is Protestants
versus Catholics, men versus women, young versus old, and washed versus
unwashed in a relentless brawl of Royal plots and purges.
     Just when the viewer becomes complacent that this is another regal
fashion and frolic painting come to life,  the film quickly changes.
Highly volatile action scenes erupt and dissipate quickly, bringing a
sense of urgency and realism to the film. No attempt to soft peddle the
dark events of the age is made. Hand to hand violence seldom reaches
this level outside of a George Romero zombie film. As quickly as it
began, the action falls down into a slow simmer, a hanging threat over
the rest of the film.
     Playing the role of twisted puppet master is Catherine de Medici.
Similar to Lydia in "I, Claudius," she is a demon matriarch who will
stop at no foul plan to solidify her power. Virtually all the dark
deeds in the highly complex story are at her instigation. Virna Lisi,
1960's glamour icon, makes no attempt to find a good side to her
character. She plays Catherine as an aging Black Widow spider in
unflattering gowns and make-up. Parenthetically, the character of
Catherine de Medici figured into the plot of the recent NOSTRADAMUS.
Nostradamus does not figure into the plot of this film.
     The title role goes to the beautiful Isabelle Adjani as Queen
Margot. Her wedding and its aftermath are the crux of the film. Besides
the action, QUEEN MARGOT offers a liberal dose of romantic intrigue.
Queen Margot and others in the court take their arranged marriages
lightly. The intensely passionate story of Queen Margot and her lover
is sure to satisfy costume drama fans that prefer romance to violence.
Ms Adjani elicits sympathy for her character, who is more of a pawn
than a player in these chaotic times. Some of the romance novel ploys,
like wandering the streets in a mask looking for an anonymous lover,
may strike some as far fetched. In this film's grand scheme of excess,
it is not too far fetched.
     Jean-Hugues Anglade, who appeared recently in KILLING ZOE, gives
another unrestrained performance as one of the Medici clan. This time
the production is so large in scale, that he fits in quite well. The
grand subject matter of the French court really lends itself to a broad
acting style.
     Parts of Portugal are sometimes unconvincingly substituted for
France, but that is a minor problem in an otherwise astonishing film.
Fans of both action and romance should be quite pleased by this film,
if one element does not deter them from the other. From set and costume
design to story and performance, this is one of the best films of the
year. That it is getting a special one-week-only year-end release
alerts one that it is a contender for Best Foreign Film awards.

Title
Review for Killer (1994)
Directed by Mark Malone
Starring: Anthony LaPaglia, Mimi Rogers, Matt Craven, Peter Boyle
Written by Gordon Melbourne from a story by the director
     There was a time before television that all films were shown as
double features.  The low budget B films, if they were to be remembered
at all, had to make creative use of the left over sets and small
non-star cast.  B film makers found that instead of expensive action,
they  were better off offering dramatic tension based in offbeat
characters.  BULLETPROOF HEART takes the B crime dramas of the Forties
and Fifties like HE WALKED BY NIGHT and D.O.A. as its model.
     Director Mark Malone masterfully recreates the ambiance of the
B-film New York- misty night streets, fancy apartments, the inevitable
docks and warehouses.  In it he sets forth several people in the throws
of inner turmoil: Anthony LaPaglia as the edgy hit man, Matt Craven as
a screw up begging for a second chance, Peter Boyle as a middle
management mobster and Mimi Rogers as the femme fatale.  These character
actors play out the events in one night of an emotionally troubled mob
hit man.  Like several recent crime films, the main thing isn't so much
the story as the telling of the story.  Since the film is basically a
four way character study, all of the performances have to be dead on.
Luckily everybody delivers.  The cynical banter between the main
characters is the center of the film.  As the long night progresses and
the characters go to stranger and stranger locations,  the motivations
of the characters are revealed.  Some of this revelation includes a
fascinating set of flash backs.  The simple job of the hit man takes on
more complexities as the characters become fully developed and
intertwined.
     BULLETPROOF HEART is a near perfect recreation of the 1950s film
noir mood.  If anything, it stays too closely within genre conventions.
Ultimately that makes the surprise ending a little predictable.  It
takes fewer chances than the recent RESERVOIR DOGS or RED ROCK WEST and
next to those films it is an 'also ran.' The problem with trying to
recreate a B film is the original B films were never supposed to be
worth the price of admission on their own.  They were thrown in for free
with another better film.  BULLETPROOF HEART would be a real find for
free on cable TV or a good video rental.  Standing as a single feature
at full admission price, it is for diehard fans of film noir.

Title
Review for Oleanna (1994)
Written and directed by David Mamet
Starring William H. Macy and Debra Eisenstadt
     In one of his books on how to write, David Mamet says to enter
scenes late and leave them early.  That seems to be the guiding
principle of his new film, OLEANNA.  At best it seems to be sections of
a story, lacking a beginning act.  It would be easy to dismiss this
project as a one-set two-person avant garde play that underwent an
unsuccessful canning process.  As a work of cinema, it is uncinematic.
Even as a play, the delivery of the lines is flat and emotionless.
Once the viewer leaves behind his notions of what a film or play should
be, however, the film becomes a challenging experience.
     OLEANNA is Mamet's most unconventional work for the screen.  His
trademark street language has been replaced by an at first annoying
semantic game.  This game is a metaphor for the academic process.  The
meaning of words and groups of words in and out of context are
questioned and requestioned by the two actors.  Replacing his freehand
use of the f-word in films like HOMICIDE is the constant use of "what
does that mean?"  With a lot of academic sounding words it seems
nothing is said, or even happens.  For an extended excruciating opening
act, the two characters, a professor and a failing student seem to
miscommunicate completely.  The subject of the class isn't even clearly
defined.  This scene is the key incident of the film.  What happened in
the non-event becomes the basis for minute discussion in the following
scenes.
     It is here that the flatness of the acting is brilliant.  The
audience can hear the words, but must  find their own meaning for
them.  The two characters are such blanks, with no developed past, that
whole personalities must be projected onto them.  Outside factors like
unseen student and academic groups must be completely imagined.  This
leaves the bare elements of the story open to various interpretations,
so much so that each viewer practically sees a different film.
     Mamet's project was to create a play, now a film, about sexual
harassment in the academic setting.  He wanted to raise questions but
not give answers.  It is impossible to leave this film without thinking
that one of the characters was greatly wronged, but the choice of which
one  is up to the individual viewer.
     The film has various flaws to be sure.  The student seems to
increase greatly in both intellect and self confidence from one scene
to the next, although a viewer could invent various reasons for this.
The professor, an intelligent man, seems to miss several crucial
phrases of dialogue.  In this manner the characters miss out on being
real people and instead become didactic homunculi for academic
patriarchy and feminist political correctness.
     Perhaps the subject is more immediate and successful as a play.
Nonetheless the film is, if not enjoyable, at least provocative.  It is
a welcome tonic to the multi-million dollar escapist films that have
recently had so little to say.
